<eecs485_article>
	<eecs485_article_id>1273</eecs485_article_id>
	<eecs485_article_title>Augustus</eecs485_article_title>
	<eecs485_article_body>








Augustus (;( entry Augustus)
;(In Latin, Augustus name would be inscribed as IMPERATOR GAIVS IVLIVS CAESAR AVGVSTVS.)
23 September 63 BC  19 August AD 14) is considered the first emperor of the Empire, which he ruled alone from 27 BC until his death in 14 AD.(The dates of his rule are contemporary dates; Augustus lived under two calendars, the Roman Republican until 45 BC, and the Julian after 45 BC. Due to departures from Julius Caesars intentions, Augustus restored the Julian calendar in 8 BC, and the correspondence between the Julian calendar and the actual calendar observed in Rome is uncertain before 8 BC.(Blackburn & Holford-Strevens 2003: 6701)) Born Gaius Octavius Thurinus, he was adopted posthumously by his great-uncle Gaius Julius Caesar in 44 BC via his last will and testament, and between then and 27 BC was officially named Gaius Julius Caesar. In 27 BC the Senate awarded him the honorific Augustus (the revered one), and thus consequently he was Gaius Julius Caesar Augustus.(Formally Imperator Caesar, Divi filius, Augustus which means Imperator Caesar, Son of the Divus (Divus Julius), Augustus.) Because of the various names he bore, it is common to call him Octavius when referring to events between 63 and 44 BC, Octavian (or Octavianus) when referring to events between 44 and 27 BC, and Augustus when referring to events after 27 BC. In Greek sources, Augustus is known as  (Octavius/Oktabios),  (Caesar/Kaisar),  (Augustus/Augustos), or  (Sebastos), depending on context.

The young Octavius came into his inheritance after Caesars assassination in 44 BC. In 43 BC, Octavian joined forces with Antony and Marcus Aemilius Lepidus in a dictatorship known as the Triumvirate. As a triumvir, Octavian ruled Rome and many of its provinces.(Some provinces were governed by the Senate.) The triumvirate was eventually torn apart under the competing ambitions of its rulers: Lepidus was driven into exile, and Antony committed suicide following his defeat at the of Actium by the fleet of Octavian commanded by Agrippa in 31 BC.

After the demise of the Second Triumvirate, Octavian restored the outward facade of the Republic, with governmental power vested in the Senate, but in practice retained his autocratic power. It took several years to determine the exact framework by which a formally republican state could be led by a sole ruler; the result became known as the Empire. The emperorship was never an office like the dictatorship which Caesar and Sulla had held before him; indeed, he declined it when the Roman populace entreated him to take on the dictatorship.(Gruen (2005), 35.) By law, Augustus held a collection of powers granted to him for life by the Senate, including those of tribune of the plebs and censor. He was consul until 23 BC.(Dio (1987), 153.) His substantive power stemmed from financial success and resources gained in conquest, the building of patronage relationships throughout the Empire, the loyalty of many military soldiers and veterans, the authority of the many honors granted by the Senate,( and the respect of the people. Augustus control over the majority of Romes legions established an armed threat that could be used against the Senate, allowing him to coerce the Senates decisions. With his ability to eliminate senatorial opposition by means of arms, the Senate became docile towards him. His rule through patronage, military power, and accumulation of the offices of the defunct Republic became the model for all later imperial governments.

The reign of Augustus initiated an era of relative peace known as the Romana, or Roman peace. Despite continuous wars on the frontiers, and one year-long civil war over the imperial succession, the Mediterranean world remained at peace for more than two centuries. Augustus enlarged the empire dramatically, annexing Egypt, Dalmatia, Pannonia, and Raetia, expanded possessions in Africa, and completed the conquest of Hispania. Beyond the frontiers, he secured the empire with states, and made peace with Parthia through diplomacy. He reformed the Roman system of taxation, developed networks of roads with an official courier system, established a standing army, established the Guard, and created official police and fire-fighting services for Rome. Much of the city was rebuilt under Augustus; and he wrote a record of his own accomplishments, known as the Gestae Divi Augusti, which has survived. Upon his death in AD 14, Augustus was declared a god by the Senateto be worshipped by the Romans.( His names Augustus and Caesar were adopted by every subsequent emperor; and the sixth month of the Roman calendar, previously named Sextilis, was renamed Augustus (August in English) in his honour. He was succeeded by his adopted son (also stepson and former son-in-law), Tiberius.


Early life

While his paternal family was from the town of Velletri, about 25 miles from Rome, Augustus was born in the city of Rome on 23 September 63 BC. He was born at Ox Head, a small property on the Hill, very close to the Forum. He was given the name Gaius Octavius Thurinus, his cognomen possibly commemorating his fathers victory at Thurii over a rebellious band of slaves.(Suetonius, Augustus 7)(56 on-line text.) Due to the crowded nature of Rome at the time, Octavius was taken to his fathers home village at Velletri to be raised. Octavius only mentions his fathers equestrian family briefly in his memoirs. His paternal great-grandfather was a military tribune in Sicily during the Punic War. His grandfather had served in several local political offices. His father, also named Gaius Octavius, had been governor of Macedonia.(Suetonius, Augustus The Marcus Octavius vetoing the law suggested by Gracchus in 133 BC was possibly his ancestor. 14.)(Rowell (1962), 14.) His mother Atia was the niece of Caesar.

In 59 BC, when he was four years old, his father died.(Chisholm (1981), 23.) His mother married a former governor of Syria, Marcius Philippus.(Suetonius, Augustus 48; of Damascus, Augustus 3. ) Philippus claimed descent from the Great, and was elected consul in 56 BC. Philippus never had much of an interest in young Octavius. Because of this, Octavius was raised by his grandmother (and Julius Caesars sister), Julia Caesaris.

In 52 or 51 BC, Julia Caesaris died. Octavius delivered the funeral oration for his grandmother.(Suetonius, Augustus 8.1; Quintilian, 12.6.1.) From this point, his mother and stepfather took a more active role in raising him. He donned the virilis four years later,(Suetonius, Augustus 8.1) and was elected to the of Pontiffs in 47 BC.(Nicolaus of Damascus, Augustus 4. )(Rowell (1962), 16.) The following year he was put in charge of the Greek games that were staged in honor of the of Venus Genetrix, built by Julius Caesar.( According to of Damascus, Octavius wished to join Caesars staff for his campaign in Africa but gave way when his mother protested.(Nicolaus of Damascus, Augustus 6. ) In 46 BC, she consented for him to join Caesar in Hispania, where he planned to fight the forces of Pompey, Caesars late enemy, but Octavius fell ill and was unable to travel.

When he had recovered, he sailed to the front, but was shipwrecked; after coming ashore with a handful of companions, he crossed hostile territory to Caesars camp, which impressed his great-uncle considerably.( Velleius Paterculus reports that Caesar afterwards allowed the young man to share his carriage.(Velleius Paterculus 2.59.3.) When back in Rome, Caesar deposited a new will with the Virgins, naming Octavius as the prime beneficiary.(Suetonius, Julius 83.)

Rise to power
Heir to Caesar
File:Gerome Death of Caesar.jpg|thumb|300px|The Death of Caesar, by Grme (1867). On 15 March 44 BC, Octaviuss adoptive father Julius Caesar was assassinated by a conspiracy led by Junius Brutus and Cassius Longinus.

At the time Caesar was killed on the of March (the 15th) 44 BC, Octavius was studying and undergoing military training in Illyria. Rejecting the advice of some army officers to take refuge with the troops in Macedonia, he sailed to Italia to ascertain if he had any potential political fortunes or security.(Eck (2003), 9.) After landing at Lupiae near Brundisium, he learned the contents of Caesars will, and only then did he decide to become Caesars political heir as well as heir to two-thirds of his estate.(((Appian, Civil Wars 3.911.) Having no living legitimate children,(His daughter Julia had died in 54 BC.) Caesar had adopted his great-nephew Octavius as his son and main heir.(Rowell (1962), 15.) Upon his adoption, Octavius assumed his great-uncles name, Gaius Julius Caesar. Although Romans who had been adopted into a new family usually retained their old nomen in cognomen form (e.g. Octavianus for one who had been an Octavius, Aemilianus for one who had been an Aemilius, etc.) there is no evidence that he ever bore the name Octavianus, as it would have made his modest origins too obvious.(Mackay (2004), 160.)((Southern, Augustus pp.2021) However, despite the fact that he never officially bore the name Octavianus, to save confusing the dead dictator with his heir, historians often refer to the new Caesarbetween his adoption and his assumption, in 27 BC, of the name Augustusas Octavian.(Southern, Augustus pp.21) Antony later charged that Octavian had earned his adoption by Caesar through sexual favours, though Suetonius, in his work of the Twelve Caesars, describes Antonys accusation as political slander.(Suetonius, Augustus 68, 71.)

To make a successful entry into the upper echelons of the Roman political hierarchy, Octavian could not rely on his limited funds.(Eck (2003), 910.) After a warm welcome by Caesars soldiers at Brundisium,( Octavian demanded a portion of the funds that were allotted by Caesar for the intended war against Parthia in the Middle East.( This amounted to 700 million sesterces stored at Brundisium, the staging ground in Italy for military operations in the east.(Rowell (1962), 18.) A later senatorial investigation into the disappearance of the public funds made no action against Octavian, since he subsequently used that money to raise troops against the Senates arch enemy, Mark Antony.(Rowell (1962), 19.) Octavian made another bold move in 44 BC when without official permission he appropriated the annual tribute that had been sent from Romes Eastern province to Italy.(Eck (2003), 10.)(Eder (2005), 18.) Octavian began to bolster his personal forces with Caesars veteran legionaries and with troops designated for the Parthian war, gathering support by emphasizing his status as heir to Caesar.((Appian, Civil Wars 3.1112.) On his march to Rome through Italy, Octavians presence and newly acquired funds attracted many, winning over Caesars former veterans stationed in Campania.( By June he had gathered an army of 3,000 loyal veterans, paying each a salary of 500 denarii.(Chisholm (1981), 24.)(Chisholm (1981), 27.)(Rowell (1962), 20.)


Arriving in Rome on 6 May 44 BC,( Octavian found the consul Antony, Caesars former colleague, in an uneasy truce with the dictators assassins; they had been granted a general amnesty on 17 March, yet Antony succeeded in driving most of them out of Rome.( This was due to his inflammatory eulogy given at Caesars funeral, mounting public opinion against the assassins.( Although Mark Antony was amassing political support, Octavian still had opportunity to rival him as the leading member of the faction supporting Caesar. Mark Antony had lost the support of many Romans and supporters of Caesar when he at first opposed the motion to elevate Caesar to divine status.(Eck (2003), 11.) Octavian failed to persuade Antony to relinquish Caesars money to him. However, during the summer he managed to win support from Caesarian sympathizers, who saw the younger heir as the lesser evil and hoped to manipulate him, or to bear with him during their efforts to get rid of Antonius.(Syme (1939), 114120.) In September, the Optimate orator Marcus Tullius Cicero began to attack Antony in a series of speeches portraying Antony as the greatest threat to the order of the Senate.(Chisholm (1981), 26.)(Rowell (1962), 30.) With opinion in Rome turning against him and his year of consular power nearing its end, Antony attempted to pass laws which would lend him control over Gaul, which had been assigned as part of his province, from Junius Brutus Albinus, one of Caesars assassins.(Eck (2003), 1112.)(Rowell (1962), 21.) Octavian meanwhile built up a private army in Italy by recruiting Caesarian veterans, and on 28 November won over two of Antonys legions with the enticing offer of monetary gain.(Syme (1939), 123126.)(Eck (2003), 12.)(Rowell (1962), 23.) In the face of Octavians large and capable force, Antony saw the danger of staying in Rome, and to the relief of the Senate he fled to Cisalpine Gaul, which was to be handed to him on 1 January.(

First conflict with Antony
File:Bust of augustus.jpg|thumb|upright|Bust of Augustus in Capitolini, Rome
After Decimus Brutus refused to give up Gaul, Antony besieged him at Mutina.(Rowell (1962), 24.) The resolutions passed by the Senate to stop the violence were rejected by Antony, as the Senate had no army of its own to challenge him; this provided an opportunity for Octavian, who was already known to have armed forces.( Cicero also defended Octavian against Antonys taunts about Octavians lack of noble lineage; he stated we have no more brilliant example of traditional piety among our youth.(Chisholm (1981), 29.)  This was in part a rebuttal to Antonys opinion of Octavian, as Cicero quoted Antony saying to Octavian, You, boy, owe everything to your name.(Chisholm (1981), 30.)(Rowell (1962), 1920.) In this unlikely alliance orchestrated by the arch anti-Caesarian senator Cicero, the Senate inducted Octavian as senator on  1 January 43 BC, yet he was also given the power to vote alongside the former consuls.(( In addition, Octavian was granted imperium (commanding power), which made his command of troops legal, sending him to relieve the siege along with Hirtius and Pansa (the consuls for 43 BC).((Syme (1939), 167.) In April of 43 BC, Antonys forces were defeated at the battles of Forum Gallorum and Mutina, forcing Antony to retreat to Gaul. However, both consuls were killed, leaving Octavian in sole command of their armies.(Syme (1939), 173174)(Scullard (1982), 157.)

After heaping many more rewards on Decimus Brutus than  Octavian for defeating Antony, the Senate attempted to give command of the consular legions to Decimus Brutus, yet Octavian decided not to cooperate.(Rowell (1962), 2627.) Instead, Octavian stayed in the Valley and refused to aid any further offensive against Antony.(Rowell (1962), 27.) In July, an embassy of centurions sent by Octavian entered Rome and demanded that he receive the consulship left vacant by Hirtius and Pansa.(Chisholm (1981), 3233.) Octavian also demanded that the decree declaring Antony a public enemy should be rescinded.( When this was refused, he marched on the city with eight legions.( He encountered no military opposition in Rome, and on  19 August 43 BC was elected consul with his relative Pedius as co-consul.(Eck (2003), 14.)(Rowell (1962), 28.) Meanwhile, Antony formed an alliance with Marcus Aemilius Lepidus, another leading Caesarian.(Syme (1939), 176186.)

Second Triumvirate
Proscriptions
File:Antony with Octavian aureus.jpg|thumb|Roman aurei bearing the portraits of Antony (left) and Octavian (right), issued in 41 BC to celebrate the  establishment of the Triumvirate by Octavian, Antony and Marcus Lepidus in 43 BC. Both sides bear the inscription III VIR R P C, meaning One of Three Men for the Regulation of the Republic.()

In a meeting near Bologna in October of 43 BC, Octavian, Antony, and Lepidus formed a junta called the Triumvirate.( This explicit arrogation of special powers lasting five years was then supported by law passed by the plebs, unlike the unofficial Triumvirate formed by Pompey Magnus, Caesar and Licinius Crassus.(Eck (2003), 15.)(Scullard (1982), 163.) The triumvirs then set in motion proscriptions in which allegedly 300 senators and 2,000 equites were branded as outlaws and deprived of their property and, for those who failed to escape, their lives.( The estimation that 300 senators were proscribed was presented by Appian, although his earlier contemporary Livy asserted that only 130 senators had been proscribed.(Southern (1998), 5253.) This decree issued by the triumvirate was motivated in part by a need to raise money to pay their troops salaries for the upcoming conflict against Caesars assassins, Junius Brutus and Cassius Longinus.(Scullard (1982), 164.) Rewards for their arrest gave incentive for Romans to capture those proscribed, while the assets and properties of those arrested were seized by the triumvirs.(Eck (2003), 16.)

Contemporary Roman historians provide conflicting reports as to which triumvir was more responsible for the proscriptions and killing. However, the sources agree that enacting the proscriptions was a means by all three factions to eliminate political enemies.(Scott (1933), 1920.) Velleius Paterculus asserted that Octavian tried to avoid proscribing officials whereas Lepidus and Antony were to blame for initiating them.( Dio defended Augustus as trying to spare as many as possible, whereas Antony and Lepidus, being older and involved in politics longer, had many more enemies to deal with.( This claim was rejected by Appian, who maintained that Octavian shared an equal interest with Lepidus and Antony in eradicating his enemies.(Scott (1933), 20.) Suetonius presents the case that Octavian, although reluctant at first to proscribe officials, nonetheless pursued his enemies with more rigor than the other triumvirs.( Plutarch describes the proscriptions as a ruthless and cutthroat swapping of friends and family between Antony, Lepidus, and Octavian. For example, Octavian allowed the proscription of his ally Cicero, Antony the proscription of his maternal uncle Julius Caesar IV, and Lepidus his brother Paulus.(Scott (1933), 19.)

File:S0484.4.jpg|thumb|left|A denarius minted c. 18 BC. Obverse: CAESAR AVGVSTVS; reverse: DIVVSIVLIVS (DIVINE JULIUS)

Battle of Philippi and division of territory

On 1 January 42 BC, the Senate posthumously recognized Julius Caesar as a divinity of the Roman state, Iulius. Octavian was able to further his cause by emphasizing the fact that he was filius, Son of God.(Syme (1939), 202.) Antony and Octavian then sent 28 legions by sea to face the armies of Brutus and Cassius, who had built their base of power in Greece.(Eck (2003), 17.) After two battles at Philippi in Macedonia in October of 42, the Caesarian army was victorious and Brutus and Cassius committed suicide. Mark Antony would later use the examples of these battles as a means to belittle Octavian, as both battles were decisively won with the use of Antonys forces.(Eck (2003), 1718.) In addition to claiming responsibility for both victories, Antony also branded Octavian as a coward for handing over his direct military control to Vipsanius Agrippa instead.(

After Philippi, a new territorial arrangement was made among the members of the Second Triumvirate. While Antony placed Gaul, the provinces of Hispania, and Italia in the hands of Octavian, Antony traveled east to Egypt where he allied himself with Queen Cleopatra VII, the former lover of Julius Caesar and mother of Caesars infant son, Caesarion. Lepidus was left with the province of Africa, stymied by Antony who conceded Hispania to Octavian instead.(Eck (2003), 18.)  Octavian was left to decide where in Italy to settle the tens of thousands of veterans of the Macedonian campaign whom the triumvirs had promised to discharge. The tens of thousands who had fought on the republican side with Brutus and Cassius, who could easily ally with a political opponent of Octavian if not appeased, also required land.( There was no more government-controlled land to allot as settlements for their soldiers, so Octavian had to choose one of two options: alienating many Roman citizens by confiscating their land, or alienating many Roman soldiers who could mount a considerable opposition against him in the Roman heartland; Octavian chose the former.(Eck (2003), 1819.)  There were as many as eighteen Roman towns affected by the new settlements, with entire populations driven out or at least given partial evictions.(Eck (2003), 19.)

Rebellion and marriage alliances

Widespread dissatisfaction with Octavian over his soldiers settlements encouraged many to rally at the side of Lucius Antonius, who was brother of Mark Antony and supported by a majority in the Senate.(  Meanwhile, Octavian asked for a divorce from Pulchra, the daughter of Fulvia and her first husband Clodius Pulcher. Claiming that his marriage with Clodia had never been consummated, he returned her to her mother, Mark Antonys wife. Fulvia decided to take action. Together with Lucius Antonius she raised an army in Italy to fight for Antonys rights against Octavian. However, Lucius and Fulvia took a political and martial gamble in opposing Octavian, since the Roman army still depended on the triumvirs for their salaries.( Lucius and his allies ended up in a defensive siege at Perusia (modern Perugia), where Octavian forced them into surrender in early 40 BC.( Lucius and his army were spared due to his kinship with Antony, the strongman of the East, while Fulvia was exiled to Sicyon.(Rowell (1962), 32.) However, Octavian showed no mercy for the mass of allies loyal to Lucius; on 15 March, the anniversary of Julius Caesars assassination, he had 300 Roman senators and equestrians executed for allying with Lucius.(Eck (2003), 20.) Perusia was also pillaged and burned as a warning for others.( This bloody event sullied Octavians reputation and was criticized by many, such as the Augustan poet Propertius.(

Pompeius, son of the First Triumvir Pompey and still a renegade general following Julius Caesars victory over his father, was established in Sicily and Sardinia as part of an agreement reached with the Second Triumvirate in 39 BC.(Scullard (1982), 162) Both Antony and Octavian were vying for an alliance with Pompeius, who was ironically a member of the republican party, not the Caesarian faction.( Octavian succeeded in a temporary alliance when in 40 BC he married Scribonia, a daughter of Scribonius Libo who was a follower of Pompeius as well as his father-in-law.( Scribonia conceived Octavians only natural child, Julia, who was born the same day that he divorced Scribonia to marry Livia Drusilla, little more than a year after his marriage.(

While in Egypt, Antony had been engaged in an affair with Cleopatra and had fathered three children with her.(Helios, Selene II and Ptolemy Philadelphus) Aware of his deteriorating relationship with Octavian, Antony left Cleopatra; he sailed to Italy in 40 BC with a large force to oppose Octavian, laying siege to Brundisium. However, this new conflict proved untenable for both Octavian and Antony. Their centurions, who had become important figures politically, refused to fight due to their Caesarian cause, while the legions under their command followed suit.(Eck (2003) 21.)(Eder (2005), 19.) Meanwhile in Sicyon, Antonys wife Fulvia died of a sudden illness while Antony was en route to meet her. Fulvias death and the mutiny of their centurions allowed the two remaining triumvirs to effect a reconciliation.(( In the autumn of 40, Octavian and Antony approved the Treaty of Brundisium, by which Lepidus would remain in Africa, Antony in the East, Octavian in the West. The Italian peninsula was left open to all for the recruitment of soldiers, but in reality, this provision was useless for Antony in the East.( To further cement relations of alliance with Mark Antony, Octavian gave his sister, Minor, in marriage to Antony in late 40 BC.( During their marriage, Octavia gave birth to two daughters (known as Major and Minor).

War with Pompeius
File:Denarius Sextus Pompeius-Scilla.jpg|thumb|A denarius of Pompeius, minted for his victory over Octavians fleet. On the obverse the Pharus of Messina, who defeated Octavian. On the reverse, the monster Scylla

Sextus Pompeius threatened Octavian in Italy by denying to the peninsula shipments of grain through the Mediterranean; Pompeius own son was put in charge as naval commander in the effort to cause widespread famine in Italy.( Pompeius control over the sea prompted him to take on the name Neptuni filius, son of Neptune.(Eck (2003), 22.) A temporary peace agreement was reached in 39 BC with the treaty of Misenum; the blockade on Italy was lifted once Octavian granted Pompeius Sardinia, Corsica, Sicily, and the Peloponnese, and ensured him a future position as consul for  35 BC.(( The territorial agreement amongst the triumvirs and Sextus Pompeius began to crumble once Octavian divorced Scribonia and married Livia on  17 January 38 BC.(Eck (2003), 23.) One of Pompeius naval commanders betrayed him and handed over Corsica and Sardinia to Octavian. However Octavian needed Antonys additional support to attack Pompeius, so an agreement was reached with the Second Triumvirates extension for another five-year period beginning in 37 BC.(Scullard (1982), 163)(Eck (2003), 24.) In supporting Octavian, Antony expected to gain support for his own campaign against Parthia, desiring to avenge Romes defeat at Carrhae in 53 BC.( In an agreement reached at Tarentum, Antony provided 120 ships for Octavian to use against Pompeius, while Octavian was to send 20,000 legionaries to Antony for use against Parthia.(Eck (2003), 25.) However, Octavian sent only a tenth the number of those promised, which was viewed by Antony as an intentional provocation.(

Octavian and Lepidus launched a joint operation against Sextus in Sicily in 36 BC.(Eck (2003), 2526.) Despite setbacks for Octavian, the naval fleet of Sextus Pompeius was almost entirely destroyed on 3 September by general Agrippa at the naval of Naulochus.( Sextus fled with his remaining forces to the east, where he was captured and executed in Miletus by one of Antonys generals the following year.(Eck (2003), 26.)  Both Lepidus and Octavian gathered the surrendered troops of Pompeius, yet Lepidus felt empowered enough to claim Sicily for himself, ordering Octavian to leave.(  However, Lepidus troops deserted him and defected to Octavian since they were weary of fighting and found Octavians promises of money to be enticing.( Lepidus surrendered to Octavian and was permitted to retain the office of maximus (head of the college of priests), but was ejected from the Triumvirate, his public career at an end, and was effectively exiled to a villa at Cape Circei in Italy.((Scullard (1982), 164) The Roman dominions were now divided between Octavian in the West and Antony in the East. To maintain peace and stability in his portion of the Empire, Octavian ensured Romes citizens of their rights to property. This time he settled his discharged soldiers outside of Italy while returning 30,000 slaves to former Roman owners that had previously fled to Pompeius to join his army and navy.(Eck (2003), 2627.)  To ensure his own safety and that of Livia and Octavia once he returned to Rome, Octavian had the Senate grant him, his wife, and his sister tribunal immunity, or sacrosanctitas.(Eck (2003), 2728.)

War with Antony

File:Lawrence Alma-Tadema- Anthony and Cleopatra.JPG|thumb|Anthony and Cleopatra, by Alma-Tadema

Meanwhile, Antonys campaign against Parthia turned disastrous, tarnishing his image as a leader, and the mere 2,000 legionaries sent by Octavian to Antony were hardly enough to replenish his forces.(Eck (2003), 29.) On the other hand, Cleopatra could restore his army to full strength, and since he was already engaged in a romantic affair with her, he decided to send Octavia back to Rome.(Eck (2003), 2930.) Octavian used this to spread propaganda implying that Antony was becoming less than Roman because he rejected a legitimate Roman spouse for an Oriental paramour.(Eck (2003), 30.) In 36 BC, Octavian used a political ploy to make himself look less autocratic and Antony more the villain by proclaiming that the civil wars were coming to an end, and that he would step down as triumvir if only Antony would do the same; Antony refused.(Eder (2005), 20.)

After Roman troops captured the Kingdom of Armenia in 34 BC, Antony made his son Alexander Helios the ruler of Armenia; he also awarded the title Queen of Kings to Cleopatra, acts which Octavian used to convince the Roman Senate that Antony had ambitions to diminish the preeminence of Rome.( When Octavian became consul once again on  1 January 33 BC, he opened the following session in the Senate with a vehement attack on Antonys grants of titles and territories to his relatives and to his queen.(Eck (2003), 31.)  Defecting consuls and senators rushed over to the side of Antony in disbelief of the propaganda (which turned out to be true), yet so did able ministers desert Antony for Octavian in the autumn of 32 BC.(Eck (2003), 3234.) These defectors, Munatius Plancus and Marcus Titius, gave Octavian the information he needed to confirm with the Senate all the accusations he made against Antony.(Eck (2003), 34.) By storming the sanctuary of the Vestal Virgins, Octavian forced their chief priestess to hand over Antonys secret will, which would have given away Roman-conquered territories as kingdoms for his sons to rule, alongside plans to build a tomb in Alexandria for him and his queen to reside upon their deaths.(Eck (2003), 3435)(Eder (2005), 2122.) In late 32 BC, the Senate officially revoked Antonys powers as consul and declared war on Cleopatras regime in Egypt.(Eck (2003), 35.)(Eder (2005), 22.)
File:Castro Battle of Actium.jpg|thumb|left|The of Actium, by Lorenzo Castro, painted 1672, National Maritime Museum, London

In early 31 BC, while Antony and Cleopatra were temporarily stationed in Greece, Octavian gained a preliminary victory when the navy under the command of Agrippa successfully ferried troops across the Sea.(Eck (2003), 37.) While Agrippa cut off Antony and Cleopatras main force from their supply routes at sea, Octavian landed on the mainland opposite the island of Corcyra (modern Corfu) and marched south.( Trapped on land and sea, deserters of Antonys army fled to Octavians side daily while Octavians forces were comfortable enough to make preparations.( In a desperate attempt to break free of the naval blockade, Antonys fleet sailed through the bay of Actium on the western coast of Greece. It was there that Antonys fleet faced the much larger fleet of smaller, more maneuverable ships under commanders Agrippa and Sosius in the of Actium on  2 September 31 BC.(Eck (2003), 38.) Antony and his remaining forces were only spared due to a last-ditch effort by Cleopatras fleet that had been waiting nearby.(Eck (2003), 3839.) Octavian pursued them, and after another defeat in Alexandria on  1 August 30 BC, Antony and Cleopatra committed suicide; Antony fell on his own sword and into Cleopatras arms, while she let a venomous snake bite her.(Eck (2003), 39.) Having exploited his position as Caesars heir to further his own political career, Octavian was only too well aware of the dangers in allowing another to do so and, reportedly commenting that two Caesars are one too many, he ordered CaesarionJulius Caesars son by Cleopatrato be killed, whilst sparing Cleopatras children by Antony, with the exception of Antonys older son.(Green (1990), 697.)(Scullard (1982), 171.)

Octavian had previously shown little mercy to military combatants and acted in ways that had proven unpopular with the Roman people, yet he was given credit for pardoning many of his opponents after the Battle of Actium.(

Octavian becomes Augustus
File:Octavian aureus circa 30 BCE.jpg|thumb|Aureus of Octavian, circa 30 BC, Museum
After Actium and the defeat of Antony and Cleopatra, Octavian was in a position to rule the entire Republic under an unofficial principate,(Gruen (2005), 3435.) but would have to achieve this through incremental power gains, courting the Senate and the people, while upholding the republican traditions of Rome, to appear that he was not aspiring to dictatorship or monarchy.((  Marching into Rome, Octavian and Marcus Agrippa were elected as dual consuls by the Senate.(  Years of civil war had left Rome in a state of near lawlessness, but the Republic was not prepared to accept the control of Octavian as a despot.  At the same time, Octavian could not simply give up his authority without risking further civil wars amongst the Roman generals, and even if he desired no position of authority whatsoever, his position demanded that he look to the well-being of the city of Rome and the provinces.  Octavians aims from this point forward were to return Rome to a state of stability, traditional legality and civility by lifting the overt political pressure imposed on the courts of law and ensuring free elections in name at least.(Eck (2003), 4445.)

First settlement

File:Caesar augustus.jpg|thumb|upright|Augustus as a magistrate. The statues marble head was made c. 3020 BC, the body sculpted in the 2nd century AD (Louvre, Paris).

In BC, Octavian made a show of returning full power to the Senate and relinquishing his control of the Roman provinces and their armies.(  Under his consulship, however, the Senate had little power in initiating legislation by introducing bills for senatorial debate.(Eck (2003), 45.)  Although Octavian was no longer in direct control of the provinces and their armies, he retained the loyalty of active duty soldiers and veterans alike.(  The careers of many clients and adherents depended on his patronage, as his financial power in the Roman Republic was unrivaled.(  The historian Eck states:

The sum of his power derived first of all from various powers of office delegated to him by the Senate and people, secondly from his immense private fortune, and thirdly from numerous patron-client relationships he established with individuals and groups throughout the Empire.  All of them taken together formed the basis of his auctoritas, which he himself emphasized as the foundation of his political actions.(Eck (2003), 113.)

To a large extent the public was aware of the vast financial resources Augustus commanded.  When he failed to encourage enough senators to finance the building and maintenance of networks of roads in Italy, he undertook direct responsibility for them in BC.(Eck (2003), 80.)  This was publicized on the Roman currency issued in BC, after he donated vast amounts of money to the aerarium Saturni, the public treasury.(

According to H.H. Scullard, however, Augustuss power was based on the exercise of a predominant military power and ... the ultimate sanction of his authority was force, however much the fact was disguised.(Scullard (1982), 211.)

The Senate proposed to Octavian, the victor of Romes civil wars, that he once again assume command of the provinces. The senates proposal was a ratification of Octavians extra-constitutional power. Through the senate Octavian was able to continue the appearance of a still-functional constitution. Feigning reluctance, he accepted a ten-year responsibility of overseeing provinces that were considered chaotic.(Eck (2003), 46.)(Scullard (1982), 210.)  The provinces ceded to him, that he might pacify them within the promised ten-year period, comprised much of the conquered Roman world, including all of Hispania and Gaul, Syria, Cilicia, Cyprus, and Egypt.((Gruen (2005), 34.) Moreover, command of these provinces provided Octavian with control over the majority of Romes legions.((Eck (2003), 47.)

While Octavian acted as consul in Rome, he dispatched senators to the provinces under his command as his representatives to manage provincial affairs and ensure his orders were carried out.( On the other hand, the provinces not under Octavians control were overseen by governors chosen by the Roman Senate.( Octavian became the most powerful political figure in the city of Rome and in most of its provinces, but did not have sole monopoly on political and martial power.( The Senate still controlled North Africa, an important regional producer of grain, as well as Illyria and Macedonia, two martially strategic regions with several legions.( However, with control of only five or six legions distributed amongst three senatorial proconsuls, compared to the twenty legions under the control of Augustus, the Senates control of these regions did not amount to any political or martial challenge to Octavian.(CCAA, 2425.)( The Senates control over some of the Roman provinces helped maintain a republican faade for the autocratic Principate.( Also, Octavians control of entire provinces for the objective of securing peace and creating stability followed Republican-era precedents, in which such prominent Romans as Pompey had been granted similar military powers in times of crisis and instability.(

File:Augustus Bevilacqua Glyptothek Munich 317.jpg|thumb|upright|Bust of Augustus, wearing the Crown. Glyptothek, Munich
In January of 27 BC, the Senate gave Octavian the new titles of Augustus and Princeps.(Eck (2003), 50.) Augustus, from the Latin word Augere (meaning to increase), can be translated as the illustrious one.(Eck (2003), 49.) It was a title of religious rather than political authority.( According to Roman religious beliefs, the title symbolized a stamp of authority over humanityand in fact naturethat went beyond any constitutional definition of his status. After the harsh methods employed in consolidating his control, the change in name would also serve to demarcate his benign reign as Augustus from his reign of terror as Octavian. His new title of Augustus was also more favorable than Romulus, the previous one he styled for himself in reference to the story of and Remus (founders of Rome), which would symbolize a second founding of Rome.( However, the title of Romulus was associated too strongly with notions of monarchy and kingship, an image Octavian tried to avoid.(Eck (2003), 149) Princeps, comes from the Latin phrase primum caput, the first head, originally meaning the oldest or most distinguished senator whose name would appear first on the senatorial roster; in the case of Augustus it became an almost regnal title for a leader who was first in charge.(Eck (2003), 3, 149.) Princeps had also been a title under the Republic for those who had served the state well; for example, Pompey had held the title.  Augustus also styled himself as Imperator Caesar divi filius, Commander Caesar son of the deified one.( With this title he not only boasted his familial link to deified Julius Caesar, but the use of Imperator signified a permanent link to the Roman tradition of victory.( The word Caesar was merely a cognomen for one branch of the Julian family, yet Augustus transformed Caesar into a new family line that began with him.(

Augustus was granted the right to hang the civica, the civic crown made from oak, above his door and have laurels drape his doorposts.(Eder (2005), 24.) This crown was usually held above the head of a Roman general during a triumph, with the individual holding the crown charged to continually repeat mori, or, Remember, you are mortal, to the triumphant general. Additionally, laurel wreaths were important in several state ceremonies, and crowns of laurel were rewarded to champions of athletic, racing, and dramatic contests. Thus, both the laurel and the oak were integral symbols of Roman religion and statecraft; placing them on Augustus doorposts was tantamount to declaring his home the capital. However, Augustus renounced flaunting insignia of power such as holding a scepter, wearing a diadem, or wearing the golden crown and purple toga of his predecessor Julius Caesar.(Eder (2005), 13.) If he refused to symbolize his power by donning and bearing these items on his person, the Senate nonetheless awarded him with a golden shield displayed in the meeting hall of the Curia, bearing the inscription virtus, pietas, clementia, iustitiavalor, piety, clemency, and justice.(Eck (2003), 3.)(

Second settlement
By 23 BC, some of the implications of the settlement of 27 BC were becoming apparent. Augustus holding of an annual consulate made his dominance over the Roman political system too obvious, whilst at the same time halving the opportunities for others to achieve what was still purported to be the head of the Roman state.(Wells, pg. 51)  Further, his desire to have his nephew Marcus Claudius Marcellus follow in his footsteps and eventually assume the Principate in his turn was causing political problems(If the testimony of Primus can be believed, where during his trial for illegally launching a war in Thrace, he asserted that he acted on the orders of Marcellus and Augustus  see Southern, pg. 108 and Eck (2003), pg. 55) and alienating his three biggest supporters  Agrippa, Maecenas and Livia.(Holland, pg. 294)  Feeling pressure from his own core group of adherents, Augustus turned to the Senate in an attempt to bolster his support there, especially with the Republicans; after his choice for co-consul in 23 BC, Terentius Varro Murena died before taking office(Ando, pg. 140; Raaflaub, pg. 426; Wells, pg. 53) he appointed the noted Republican Calpurnius Piso, who had fought against Julius Caesar and supported Cassius and Brutus.(Davies, pg. 259)

In the late spring Augustus suffered a severe illness, and on his supposed deathbed made arrangements that would ensure the continuation of the Principate in some form,(Southern, pg. 108; Holland, pg. 295) whilst at the same time put in doubt the senators suspicions of his anti-republicanism.(Eder (2005), 25.)(Eck (2003), 56.)  Augustus prepared to hand down his signet ring to his favored general Agrippa.((  However, Augustus handed over to his co-consul Piso all of his official documents, an account of public finances, and authority over listed troops in the provinces while Augustus supposedly favored nephew Marcellus came away empty-handed.(( This was a surprise to many who believed Augustus would have named an heir to his position as an unofficial emperor.(Gruen (2005), 38.) Augustus bestowed only properties and possessions to his designated heirs, as an obvious system of institutionalized imperial inheritance would have provoked resistance and hostility amongst the republican-minded Romans fearful of monarchy.(Gruen (2005), 3839.)  With regards to the Principate, it was obvious to Augustus that Marcellus was not ready to take on his position;(Stern, Gaius, Women, children, and senators on the Ara Pacis Augustae: A study of Augustus vision of a new world order in 13 BC, pg. 23) nonetheless, by giving his signet ring to Agrippa, it was Augustus intent to signal to the legions that Agrippa was to be his successor, and that no matter what the constitutional rules were, they would continue to obey Agrippa.(Holland, pgs. 294-295; Southern, pg. 108)

File:Cameo August BM Gem3577.jpg|thumb|upright|Portrait of Augustus wearing a gorgoneion on a three layered sardonyx cameo, AD 14/20
Soon after his bout of illness subsided, Augustus gave up his permanent consulship.( The only other times Augustus would serve as consul would be in the years 5 and 2 BC,((Eder (2005), 26.) both times to introduce his grandsons into public life.(Davies, pg. 259)  Although he had resigned as consul, Augustus retained his consular imperium, leading to a second compromise between him and the Senate known as the Second Settlement.(Eck (2003), 57.) This was a clever ploy by Augustus; by stepping down as one of two consuls, this allowed aspiring senators a better chance to fill that position, while at the same time Augustus could exercise wider patronage within the senatorial class.( Augustus was no longer in an official position to rule the state, yet his dominant position over the Roman provinces remained unchanged as he became a proconsul.((Gruen (2005), 37.) Earlier as a consul he had the power to intervene, when he deemed necessary, with the affairs of provincial proconsuls appointed by the Senate.(Eck (2003), 5657.) As a proconsul Augustus did not want this authority of overriding provincial governors to be stripped from him, so imperium proconsulare maius, or power over all the proconsuls was granted to Augustus by the Senate.( The existence of imperium maius is debated by scholars, and it is also argued that he was only granted imperium aequum, or power equal to that of the governors, but his supreme influence allowed him to control the affairs of the provinces.

Augustus was also granted the power of a tribune (tribunicia potestas) for life, though not the official title of tribune.( Legally it was closed to patricians, a status that Augustus had acquired years ago when adopted by Julius Caesar.(Gruen (2005), 36.) This allowed him to convene the Senate and people at will and lay business before it, veto the actions of either the Assembly or the Senate, preside over elections, and the right to speak first at any meeting.((Eck (2003), 5758.) Also included in Augustus tribunician authority were powers usually reserved for the censor; these included the right to supervise public morals and scrutinize laws to ensure they were in the public interest, as well as the ability to hold a census and determine the membership of the Senate.(Eck (2003), 59.) With the powers of a censor, Augustus appealed to virtues of Roman patriotism by banning all other attire besides the classic toga while entering the Forum.(Eder (2005), 30.) There was no precedent within the Roman system for combining the powers of the tribune and the censor into a single position, nor was Augustus ever elected to the office of censor.(Bunson (1994), 80.) Caesar had been granted similar powers, wherein he was charged with supervising the morals of the state, however this position did not extend to the censors ability to hold a census and determine the Senates roster. The office of the tribune plebis began to lose its prestige due to Augustus amassing of tribunal powers, so he revived its importance by making it a mandatory appointment for any plebeian desiring the praetorship.(Bunson (1994), 427.)

File:CaesarAugustusPontiusMaximusCloseup.jpg|thumb|left|upright|The Labicana AugustusAugustus as Maximus
In addition to tribunician authority, Augustus was granted sole imperium within the city of Rome itself: all armed forces in the city, formerly under the control of the prefects and consuls, were now under the sole authority of Augustus.(Eck (2003), 60.)  With maius imperium proconsulare, Augustus was the only individual able to receive a triumph as he was ostensibly the head of every Roman army.(Eck (2003), 61.) In 19 BC, Lucius Cornelius Balbus, governor of Africa and conqueror of the Garamantes, was the first man of provincial origin to receive this award, as well as the last.( For every following Roman victory the credit was given to Augustus, because Romes armies were commanded by the legatus, who were deputies of the princeps in the provinces.( Augustus eldest son by marriage to Livia, Tiberius, was the only exception to this rule when he received a triumph for victories in Germania in 7 BC.(Eck (2003), 117.) Ensuring that his status of maius imperium proconsulare was renewed in 13 BC, Augustus stayed in Rome during the renewal process and provided veterans with lavish donations to gain their support.(

Many of the political subtleties of the Second Settlement seem to have evaded the comprehension of the Plebeian class. When Augustus failed to stand for election as consul in 22 BC, fears arose once again that Augustus was being forced from power by the aristocratic Senate. In 22, 21, and 19 BC, the people rioted in response, and only allowed a single consul to be elected for each of those years, ostensibly to leave the other position open for Augustus.(Dio 54.1, 6, 10.) In 22 BC there was a food shortage in Rome which sparked panic, while many urban plebs called for Augustus to take on dictatorial powers to personally oversee the crisis.( After a theatrical display of refusal before the Senate, Augustus finally accepted authority over Romes grain supply by virtue of his proconsular imperium, and ended the crisis almost immediately.( It was not until AD 8 that a food crisis of this sort prompted Augustus to establish a praefectus annonae, a permanent prefect who was in charge of procuring food supplies for Rome.(Eck (2003), 78.)

Nevertheless, the were some who were concerned by the expansion of powers granted to Augustus by the Second Settlement, and this came to a head with the apparent conspiracy of Fannius Caepio and Lucinius Varro Murena.(Southern, pg. 109; Holland, pg. 299)  In early 22 BC, charges were brought against Primus, the former proconsul (governor) of Macedonia, of waging a war on the Odrysian kingdom of Thrace, whose king was a Roman ally, without prior approval of the Senate.(Wells, pg. 53)  He was defended by Murena, who told the trial that his client had received specific instructions from Augustus, ordering him to attack the client state.(Southern, pg. 108)  Later, Primus testified that the orders came from the recently deceased Marcellus.(Holland, pg. 300)  Under the Constitutional settlement of 27 BC such orders, had they been given, would have been considered a breach of the Senates prerogative, as Macedonia was under the Senates jurisdiction, not the Princeps. Such an action would have ripped away the veneer of Republican restoration as promoted by Augustus, and exposed his fraud of merely being the first citizen, a first among equals.(Southern, pg. 108)  Even worse, the involvement of Marcellus provided some measure of proof that Augustuss policy was to have the youth take his place as Princeps, instituting a form of monarchy  accusations that had already played out during the crisis of 23 BC.(Stern, Gaius, Women, children, and senators on the Ara Pacis Augustae: A study of Augustus vision of a new world order in 13 BC, pg. 23)

The situation was so serious, that Augustus himself appeared at the trial, even though he had not been called as a witness. Under oath, Augustus declared that he gave no such order.(Syme, pg. 333)  Murena, disbelieving Augustuss testimony and resentful of his attempt to subvert the trial by using his auctoritas, rudely demanded to know why Augustus had turned up to a trial to which he had not been called; Augustus replied that he came in the public interest.(Syme, pg. 333; Holland, pg. 300; Southern, pg, 108)  Although Primus was found guilty, some jurors voted to acquit, meaning that not everybody believed Augustuss testimony.(Wells, pg. 53; Raaflaub, pg. 426)  Then, sometime prior to September 1, 22 BC a certain Castricius provided Augustus with information about a conspiracy led by Fannius Caepio against the Princeps.(Swan, pg. 241; Syme, pg. 483)  Murena was named among the conspirators. Tried in absentia, with Tiberius acting as prosecutor, the jury found the conspirators guilty, but it was not a unanimous verdict.(Wells, pg. 53; Holland, pg. 301)  Sentenced to death for treason, all the accused were executed as soon as they were captured without ever giving testimony in their defence.(Davies, pg. 260; Holland, pg. 301)  Augustus ensured that the facade of Republican government continued with an effective cover-up of the events.(Holland, pg. 301)

In 19 BC, the Senate voted to allow Augustus to wear the consuls insignia in public and before the Senate,( as well as sit in the symbolic chair between the two consuls and hold the fasces, an emblem of consular authority.(Gruen (2005), 43.)  Like his tribune authority, the granting of consular powers to him was another instance of holding power of offices he did not actually hold.( This seems to have assuaged the populace; regardless of whether or not Augustus was actually a consul, the importance was that he appeared as one before the people. On 6 March 12 BC, after the death of Lepidus, he additionally took up the position of maximus, the high priest of the collegium of the Pontifices, the most important position in Roman religion.(Bowersock (1990), p. 380. The date is provided by inscribed calendars; see also Augustus, Res Gestae 10.2. Dio 27.2 reports this under 13 BC, probably as the year in which Lepidus died (Bowersock (1990), p. 383).)(Eder (2005), 28.)  On  5 February 2 BC, Augustus was also given the title patriae, or father of the country.(Mackay (2004), 186.)(Eck (2003), 129.)

Later Roman Emperors would generally be limited to the powers and titles originally granted to Augustus, though often, to display humility, newly appointed Emperors would decline one or more of the honorifics given to Augustus. Just as often, as their reign progressed, Emperors would appropriate all of the titles, regardless of whether they had actually been granted them by the Senate. The civic crown, which later Emperors took to actually wearing, consular insignia, and later the purple robes of a Triumphant general (picta) became the imperial insignia well into the Byzantine era.

War and expansion

File:Augusto 30aC - 6dC 55%CS jpg.JPG|thumb|300px|Extent of the Roman Empire under Augustus. The yellow legend represents the extent of the Republic in 31 BC, the shades of green represent gradually conquered territories under the reign of Augustus, and pink areas on the map represent states; however, areas under Roman control shown here were subject to change even during Augustus reign, especially in Germania.

Imperator Caesar Divi Filius Augustus chose Imperator, victorious commander to be his first name, since he wanted to make the notion of victory associated with him emphatically clear.(Eck (2003), 93.) By the year 13, Augustus boasted 21 occasions where his troops proclaimed imperator as his title after a successful battle.( Almost the entire fourth chapter in his publicly released memoirs of achievements known as the Res Gestae was devoted to his military victories and honors.( Augustus also promoted the ideal of a superior Roman civilization with a task of ruling the world (the extent to which the Romans knew it), a sentiment embodied in words that the contemporary poet Virgil attributes to a legendary ancestor of Augustus: tu regere imperio populos, Romane, mementoRoman, remember by your strength to rule the Earths peoples!( The impulse for expansionism, apparently prominent among all classes at Rome, is accorded divine sanction by Virgils Jupiter, who in Book 1 of the Aeneid promises Rome imperium sine fine, sovereignty without limit.(Eck (2003), 95.)
File:Tiberius NyCarlsberg01.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Bust of Tiberius, a successful military commander under Augustus before he was designated as his heir and successor

By the end of his reign, the armies of Augustus had conquered northern Hispania (modern Spain and Portugal),(Eck (2003), 94.) the Alpine regions of Raetia and Noricum (modern Switzerland, Bavaria, Austria, Slovenia),( Illyricum and Pannonia (modern Albania, Croatia, Hungary, Serbia, etc.),( and extended the borders of the Province to the east and south.( After the reign of the client king the Great (734 BC), Judea was added to the province of Syria when Augustus deposed his successor Archelaus.( Like Egypt which had been conquered after the defeat of Antony in 30 BC, Syria was governed not by a proconsul or legate of Augustus, but a high prefect of the equestrian class.( Again, no military effort was needed in 25 BC when Galatia (modern Turkey) was converted to a Roman province shortly after of Galatia was killed by an avenging widow of a slain prince from Homonada.( When the rebellious tribes of Cantabria in modern-day Spain were finally quelled in 19 BC, the territory fell under the provinces of Hispania and Lusitania.(Eck (2003), 97.) This region proved to be a major asset in funding Augustus future military campaigns, as it was rich in mineral deposits that could be fostered in Roman mining projects, especially the very rich gold deposits at Medulas for example.(

Conquering the peoples of the Alps in 16 BC was another important victory for Rome since it provided a large territorial buffer between the Roman citizens of Italy and Romes enemies in Germania to the north.(Eck (2003), 98.) The poet Horace dedicated an ode to the victory, while the monument of Augustus near Monaco was built to honor the occasion.(Eck (2003), 9899.) The capture of the Alpine region also served the next offensive in 12 BC, when Tiberius began the offensive against the Pannonian tribes of Illyricum and his brother Claudius Drusus against the Germanic tribes of the eastern Rhineland.(Eck (2003), 99.) Both campaigns were successful, as Drusus forces reached the Elbe River by 9 BC, yet he died shortly after by falling off his horse.( It was recorded that the pious Tiberius walked in front of his brothers body all the way back to Rome.(

File:Panormica de Las Mdulas.jpg|thumb|mine of Mdulas.
File:TabulaPeutingerianaMuziris.jpg|thumb|right|Muziris in the Kingdom of India, as shown in the Peutingeriana, with depiction of a Temple of Augustus (Templum Augusti), an illustration of relations in the period.
To protect Romes eastern territories from the Empire, Augustus relied on the states of the east to act as territorial buffers and areas which could raise their own troops for defense.(Eck (2003), 96.) To ensure security of the Empires eastern flank, Augustus stationed a Roman army in Syria, while his skilled stepson Tiberius negotiated with the Parthians as Romes diplomat to the East.( Tiberius was responsible for restoring Tigranes V to the throne of the Kingdom of Armenia.( Yet arguably his greatest diplomatic achievement was negotiating with IV of Parthia (372 BC) in 20 BC for the return of the battle standards lost by Crassus in the of Carrhae, a symbolic victory and great boost of morale for Rome.(Bunson (1994), 416.)((Brosius (2006), 9697, 136138.) Werner Eck claims that this was a great disappointment for Romans seeking to avenge Crassus defeat by military means.(Eck (2003), 9596.) However, Maria Brosius explains that Augustus used the return of the standards as propaganda symbolizing the submission of Parthia to Rome. The event was celebrated in art such as the breastplate design on the statue of Prima Porta and in monuments such as the Temple of Mars Ultor (Mars the Avenger) built to house the standards.(Brosius (2006), 97; see also Bivar (1983), 6667.)

Although Parthia always posed a threat to Rome in the east, the real battlefront was along the  Rhine and Danube rivers.( Before the final fight with Antony, Octavians campaigns against the tribes in Dalmatia was the first step in expanding Roman dominions to the Danube.(Rowell (1962), 13.) Victory in battle was not always a permanent success, as newly conquered territories were constantly retaken by Romes enemies in Germania.( A prime example of Roman loss in battle was the of Teutoburg Forest in AD 9, where three entire legions led by Quinctilius Varus were destroyed with few survivors by Arminius, leader of the Cherusci, an apparent Roman ally.(Eck (2003), 101102.) Augustus retaliated by dispatching Tiberius and Drusus to the Rhineland to pacify it, which had some success although the battle of AD 9 brought the end to Roman expansion into Germany.(Bunson (1994), 417.) The Roman general Germanicus took advantage of a Cherusci civil war between Arminius and Segestes; they defeated  Arminius, who fled that battle but was killed later in 21 due to treachery.(Bunson (1994), 31.)

Death and succession
File:Augustus Tiberius aureus.png|left|thumb|A Roman aureus struck under Augustus, c. AD 1314; the reverse shows Tiberius riding on a quadriga, celebrating the fifteenth renewal of his tribunal power. At least six potential heirs, including Agrippa and his sons, had expired or proven incapable of succeeding Augustus, before he finally settled on Tiberius in AD 9.

The illness of Augustus in 23 BC brought the problem of succession to the forefront of political issues and the public. To ensure stability, he needed to designate an heir to his unique position in Roman society and government. This was to be achieved in small, undramatic, and incremental ways that did not stir senatorial fears of monarchy.( If someone was to succeed his unofficial position of power, they were going to have to earn it through their own publicly proven merits.(Gruen (2005), 50.) Some Augustan historians argue that indications pointed toward his sisters son Marcellus, who had been quickly married to Augustus daughter the Elder.(Eck (2003), 114115.) Other historians dispute this due to Augustus will read aloud to the Senate while he was seriously ill in 23 BC,(Eck (2003), 115.) instead indicating a preference for Marcus Agrippa, who was Augustus second in charge and arguably the only one of his associates who could have controlled the legions and held the Empire together.( After the death of Marcellus in 23 BC, Augustus married his daughter to Agrippa. This union produced five children, three sons and two daughters: Caesar, Caesar, Julia, the Elder, and Postumus Agrippa, so named because he was born after Marcus Agrippa died. Shortly after the Second Settlement, Agrippa was granted a five-year term of administering the eastern half of the Empire with the imperium of a proconsul and the same tribunicia potestas granted to Augustus (although not trumping Augustus authority), his seat of governance stationed at Samos in the eastern Aegean.(Gruen (2005), 44.)(Eck (2003), 58.)  Although this granting of power would have shown Augustus favor for Agrippa, it was also a measure to please members of his Caesarian party by allowing one of their members to share a considerable amount of power with him.(

Augustus intent to make Gaius and Lucius Caesar his heirs was apparent when he adopted them as his own children.(Syme (1939), 416417.) He took the consulship in 5 and 2 BC so he could personally usher them into their political careers,(Scullard (1982), 217.) and they were nominated for the consulships of AD 1 and 4.(Syme (1939), 417.) Augustus also showed favor to his stepsons, Livias children from her first marriage, Claudius Drusus Germanicus and Tiberius Claudius, granting them military commands and public office, and seeming to favor Drusus. However, Drusus marriage to Antonia, Augustus niece, was a relationship far too embedded within the family to disturb over succession issues.( After Agrippa died in 12 BC, Livias son Tiberius was ordered to divorce his own wife Vipsania and marry Agrippas widow, Augustus daughter Juliaas soon as a period of mourning for Agrippa had ended.(Eck (2003), 116.) While Drusus marriage to Antonia was considered an unbreakable affair, Vipsania was only the daughter of the late Agrippa from his first marriage.(

File:Augustuksen mauseleomi.JPG|thumb|of Augustus
Tiberius shared in Augustus tribune powers as of 6 BC, but shortly thereafter went into retirement, reportedly wanting no further role in politics while he exiled himself to Rhodes.((Gruen (2005), 46.) Although no specific reason is known for his departure, it could have been a combination of reasons, including a failing marriage with Julia.(( It could very well have been from feelings of jealousy and being left out since Augustus young grandchildren-turned-sons, Gaius and Lucius, joined the college of priests at an early age, were presented to spectators in a more favorable light, and were introduced to the army in Gaul.(Eck (2003), 117118.)(Gruen (2005), 4647.) After the early deaths of both Lucius and Gaius in AD 2 and 4 respectively, and the earlier death of his brother Drusus (9 BC), Tiberius was recalled to Rome in June AD 4, where he was adopted by Augustus on the condition that he, in turn, adopt his nephew Germanicus.(Eck (2003), 119.) This continued the tradition of presenting at least two generations of heirs.( In that year, Tiberius was also granted the powers of a tribune and proconsul, emissaries from foreign kings had to pay their respects to him, and by 13 was awarded with his second triumph and equal level of imperium with that of Augustus.(Eck (2003), 119120.) The only other possible claimant as heir was Postumus Agrippa, who had been exiled by Augustus in AD 7, his banishment made permanent by senatorial decree, and Augustus officially disowned him.( He certainly fell out of Augustus favor as an heir; the historian Erich S. Gruen notes various contemporary sources that state Postumus Agrippa was a vulgar young man, brutal and brutish, and of depraved character.(Gruen (2005), 49.) Postumus Agrippa was murdered at his place of exile either shortly before or after the death of Augustus.

On 19 August AD 14, Augustus died while visiting the place of his fathers death at Nola, and Tiberiuswho was present alongside Livia at Augustus deathbedwas named his heir.(Eck (2003), 123.) Augustus famous last words were, Have I played the part well? Then applaud as I exitreferring to the play-acting and regal authority that he had put on as emperor. Publicly, though, his last words were, Behold, I found Rome of clay, and leave her to you of marble. An enormous funerary procession of mourners traveled with Augustus body from Nola to Rome, and on the day of his burial all public and private businesses closed for the day.( Tiberius and his son Drusus delivered the eulogy while standing atop two rostra.(Eck (2003), 124.) Coffin-bound, Augustus body was cremated on a pyre close to his mausoleum. It was proclaimed that Augustus joined the company of the gods as a member of the Roman pantheon.( In 410, during the Sack of Rome, the mausoleum was despoiled by the Goths and his ashes scattered.

The historian D.C.A. Shotter states that Augustus policy of favoring the Julian family line over the Claudian might have afforded Tiberius sufficient cause to show open disdain for Augustus after the latters death; instead, Tiberius was always quick to rebuke those who criticized Augustus.(Shotter (1966), 210212.) Shotter suggests that Augustus deification, coupled with Tiberius extremely conservative attitude towards religion, obliged Tiberius to suppress any open resentment he might have harbored.(Shotter (1966), 211.) Also, the historian R. Shaw-Smith points to letters of Augustus to Tiberius which display affection towards Tiberius and high regard for his military merits.( Shotter states that Tiberius focused his anger and criticism on Asinius Gallus (for marrying Vipsania after Augustus forced Tiberius to divorce her) as well as the two young Caesars Gaius and Lucius, instead of Augustus, the real architect of his divorce and imperial demotion.(

Legacy


Augustus reign laid the foundations of a regime that lasted for nearly fifteen hundred years through the ultimate decline of the Western Roman Empire and until the of Constantinople in 1453. Both his adoptive surname, Caesar, and his title Augustus became the permanent titles of the rulers of Empire for fourteen centuries after his death, in use both at Old Rome and at New Rome. In many languages, caesar became the word for emperor, as in the German Kaiser and in the Bulgarian and subsequently Russian Tsar. The cult of Divus Augustus continued until the state religion of the Empire was changed to Christianity in 391 by I. Consequently, there are many excellent statues and busts of the first emperor. He had composed an account of his achievements, the Gestae Divi Augusti, to be inscribed in bronze in front of his mausoleum.(Suetonius, Augustus 101.4.) Copies of the text were inscribed throughout the Empire upon his death.(Eck (2003), 12) The inscriptions in Latin featured translations in Greek beside it, and were inscribed on many public edifices, such as the temple in Ankara dubbed the Monumentum Ancyranum, called the queen of inscriptions by historian Mommsen.(Eck (2003), 2.) There are a few known written works by Augustus that have survived. This includes his poems Sicily, Epiphanus, and Ajax, an autobiography of 13 books, a philosophical treatise, and his written rebuttal to Brutus Eulogy of Cato.(Bunson (1994), 47.) However, historians are able to analyze existing letters penned by Augustus to others for additional facts or clues about his personal life.(Shaw-Smith (1971), 213.)(Bourne (1918), 5366.)

Many consider Augustus to be Romes greatest emperor; his policies certainly extended the Empires life span and initiated the celebrated Pax Romana or Pax Augusta. He was intelligent, decisive, and a shrewd politician, but he was not perhaps as charismatic as Caesar, and was influenced on occasion by his third wife, Livia (sometimes for the worse). Nevertheless, his legacy proved more enduring. The city of Rome was utterly transformed under Augustus, with Romes first institutionalized police force, fighting force, and the establishment of the municipal prefect as a permanent office.( The police force was divided into cohorts of 500 men each, while the units of firemen ranged from 500 to 1,000 men each, with 7 units assigned to 14 divided city sectors.( A praefectus vigilum, or Prefect of the Watch was put in charge of the vigiles, Romes fire brigade and police.(Bunson (1994), 345.) With Romes civil wars at an end, Augustus was also able to create a army for the Roman Empire, fixed at a size of 28 legions of about 170,000 soldiers.(Eck (2003), 8587.) This was supported by numerous auxiliary units of 500 soldiers each, often recruited from recently conquered areas.(Eck (2003), 86.) With his finances securing the maintenance of roads throughout Italy, Augustus also installed an official courier system of relay stations overseen by a military officer known as the praefectus vehiculorum.( Besides the advent of swifter communication amongst Italian polities, his extensive building of roads throughout Italy also allowed Romes armies to march swiftly and at an unprecedented pace across the country.(Chisholm (1981), 122.) In the year 6 Augustus established the aerarium militare, donating 170 million sesterces to the new military treasury that provided for both active and retired soldiers.(Bunson (1994), 6.) One of the most lasting institutions of Augustus was the establishment of the Guard in 27 BC, originally a personal bodyguard unit on the battlefield that evolved into an imperial guard as well as an important political force in Rome.(Bunson (1994), 341.) They had the power to intimidate the Senate, install new emperors, and depose ones they disliked; the last emperor they served was Maxentius, as it was I who disbanded them in the early 4th century and destroyed their barracks, the Praetoria.(Bunson (1994), 341342.)

File:Augustus-in-Kalabsha.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Augustus in an Egyptian-style depiction, a stone carving of the Kalabsha Temple in Nubia
Although the most powerful individual in the Roman Empire, Augustus wished to embody the spirit of Republican virtue and norms. He also wanted to relate to and connect with the concerns of the plebs and lay people. He achieved this through various means of generosity and a cutting back of lavish excess. In the year 29 BC, Augustus paid 400 sesterces each to 250,000 citizens, 1,000 sesterces each to 120,000 veterans in the colonies, and spent 700 million sesterces in purchasing land for his soldiers to settle upon.( He also restored 82 different temples to display his care for the Roman pantheon of deities.(Eder (2005), 23.) In 28 BC, he melted down 80 silver statues erected in his likeness and in honor of him, an attempt of his to appear frugal and modest.(

The longevity of Augustus reign and its legacy to the Roman world should not be overlooked as a key factor in its success. As Tacitus wrote, the younger generations alive in AD 14 had never known any form of government other than the Principate.(Tacitus, Annals I.3) Had Augustus died earlier (in 23 BC, for instance), matters might have turned out differently. The attrition of the civil wars on the old Republican oligarchy and the longevity of Augustus, therefore, must be seen as major contributing factors in the transformation of the Roman state into a facto monarchy in these years. Augustus own experience, his patience, his tact, and his political acumen also played their parts. He directed the future of the Empire down many lasting paths, from the existence of a standing professional army stationed at or near the frontiers, to the dynastic principle so often employed in the imperial succession, to the embellishment of the capital at the emperors expense. Augustus ultimate legacy was the peace and prosperity the Empire enjoyed for the next two centuries under the system he initiated. His memory was enshrined in the political ethos of the Imperial age as a paradigm of the good emperor. Every emperor of Rome adopted his name, Caesar Augustus, which gradually lost its character as a name and eventually became a title.( The Augustan era poets Virgil and Horace praised Augustus as a defender of Rome, an upholder of moral justice, and an individual who bore the brunt of responsibility in maintaining the empire.(Kelsall (1976), 120.) However, for his rule of Rome and establishing the principate, Augustus has also been subjected to criticism throughout the ages. The contemporary Roman jurist Antistius Labeo (d. AD 10/11), fond of the days of pre-Augustan republican liberty in which he had been born, openly criticized the Augustan regime.(Starr (1952), 5.) In the beginning of his Annals, the Roman historian Tacitus (c. 56c.117) wrote that Augustus had cunningly subverted Republican Rome into a position of slavery.( He continued to say that, with Augustus death and swearing of loyalty to Tiberius, the people of Rome simply traded one slaveholder for another.( Tacitus, however, records two contradictory but common views of Augustus:




According to the second opposing opinion:


In a recent biography on Augustus, Anthony Everitt asserts that through the centuries, judgments on Augustus reign have oscillated between these two extremes but stresses that:



Tacitus was of the belief that Nerva (r. 9698) successfully mingled two formerly alien ideas, principate and liberty.(Starr (1952), 6.) The 3rd century historian Cassius Dio acknowledged Augustus as a benign, moderate ruler, yet like most other historians after the death of Augustus, Dio viewed Augustus as an autocrat.( The poet Annaeus Lucanus (AD 3965) was of the opinion that Caesars victory over Pompey and the fall of the Younger (95 BC46 BC) marked the end of traditional liberty in Rome; historian Chester G. Starr, Jr. writes of his avoidance of criticizing Augustus, perhaps Augustus was too sacred a figure to accuse directly.(

The Anglo-Irish writer Swift (16671745), in his Discourse on the Contests and Dissentions in Athens and Rome, criticized Augustus for installing tyranny over Rome, and likened what he believed Britains virtuous monarchy to Romes moral Republic of the 2nd century BC.(Kelsall (1976), 118.) In his criticism of Augustus, the admiral and historian Thomas Gordon (16581741) compared Augustus to the puritanical tyrant Cromwell (15991658).( Thomas Gordon and the French political philosopher Montesquieu (16891755) both remarked that Augustus was a coward in battle.(Kelsall (1976), 119.) In his Memoirs of the Court of Augustus, the Scottish scholar Thomas Blackwell (17011757) deemed Augustus a Machiavellian ruler, a bloodthirsty vindicative usurper, wicked and worthless, a mean spirit, and a tyrant.(

Revenue reforms
File:AugustusCoinPudukottaiHoardIndia.jpg|thumb|Coin of Augustus found at the Pudukottai hoard, from an Tamil country, Kingdom of present day Nadu in India. Museum

Augustus public revenue reforms had a great impact on the subsequent success of the Empire. Augustus brought a far greater portion of the Empires expanded land base under consistent, direct taxation from Rome, instead of exacting varying, intermittent, and somewhat arbitrary tributes from each local province as Augustus predecessors had done.( This reform greatly increased Romes net revenue from its territorial acquisitions, stabilized its flow, and regularized the financial relationship between Rome and the provinces, rather than provoking fresh resentments with each new arbitrary exaction of tribute.(Eck (2003), 8384.) The measures of taxation in the reign of Augustus were determined by population census, with fixed quotas for each province.(Bunson (1994), 404.) Citizens of Rome and Italy paid indirect taxes, while direct taxes were exacted from the provinces.( Indirect taxes included a 4% tax on the price of slaves, a 1% tax on goods sold at auction, and a 5% tax on the inheritance of estates valued at over 100,000 sesterces by persons other than the of kin.(

File:AugustusIndianImitation1stCenturyCE.jpg|thumb|left|Indian imitation of a coin of Augustus. 1st century. Museum

An equally important reform was the abolition of private farming, which was replaced by salaried civil service tax collectors. Private contractors that raised taxes had been the norm in the Republican era, and some had grown powerful enough to influence the amount of votes for politicians in Rome.( The tax farmers had gained great infamy for their depredations, as well as great private wealth, by winning the right to tax local areas.( Romes revenue was the amount of the successful bids, and the tax farmers profits consisted of any additional amounts they could forcibly wring from the populace with Romes blessing. Lack of effective supervision, combined with tax farmers desire to maximize their profits, had produced a system of arbitrary exactions that was often barbarously cruel to taxpayers, widely (and accurately) perceived as unfair, and very harmful to investment and the economy.

File:HymiariteKingdomAugustusImitation1stCenturyCE.jpg|thumb|Coin of the Himyarite Kingdom, southern coast of the peninsula. This is also an imitation of a coin of Augustus. 1st century

The use of Egypts immense land rents to finance the Empires operations resulted from Augustus conquest of Egypt and the shift to a Roman form of government.(Bunson (1994), 144.) As it was effectively considered Augustus private property rather than a province of the Empire, it became part of each succeeding emperors patrimonium.(Bunson (1994), 144145.) Instead of a legate or proconsul, Augustus installed a prefect from the equestrian class to administer Egypt and maintain its lucrative seaports; this position became the highest political achievement for any equestrian besides becoming Prefect of the Praetorian Guard.(Bunson (1994), 145.) The highly productive agricultural land of Egypt yielded enormous revenues that were available to Augustus and his successors to pay for public works and military expeditions,( as well as bread and circuses for the population of Rome.

Month of August
The month of August (Latin: Augustus) is named after Augustus; until his time it was called Sextilis (named so because it had been the sixth month of the original calendar and the Latin word for six is sex). Commonly repeated lore has it that August has 31 days because Augustus wanted his month to match the length of Caesars July, but this is an invention of the 13th century scholar de Sacrobosco. Sextilis in fact had 31 days before it was renamed, and it was not chosen for its length (see calendar). According to a senatus consultum quoted by Macrobius, Sextilis was renamed to honor Augustus because several of the most significant events in his rise to power, culminating in the fall of Alexandria, fell in that month.(Macrobius, Saturnalia 1.12.35.)

Building projects


File:RomaAraPacisDecorazioneVegetale.jpg|thumb|Close up on the sculpted detail of the Pacis (Altar of Peace), 13 BC to 9 BC
On his deathbed, Augustus boasted I found a Rome of bricks; I leave to you one of marble. Although there is some truth in the literal meaning of this, Dio asserts that it was a metaphor for the Empires strength.(Dio 56.30.3) Marble could be found in buildings of Rome before Augustus, but it was not extensively used as a building material until the reign of Augustus.(  Although this did not apply to the Subura slums, which were still as rickety and fire-prone as ever, he did leave a mark on the monumental topography of the centre and of the Martius, with the Pacis (Altar of Peace) and monumental sundial, whose central gnomon was an obelisk taken from Egypt.(Eck (2003), 122.) The relief sculptures decorating the Ara Pacis visually augmented the written record of Augustus triumphs in the Res Gestae.(Bunson (1994), 32.) Its reliefs depicted the imperial pageants of the praetorians, the Vestals, and the citizenry of Rome.(  He also built the of Caesar, the of Agrippa, and the of Augustus with its of Mars Ultor. Other projects were either encouraged by him, such as the Theatre of Balbus, and Agrippas construction of the Pantheon, or funded by him in the name of others, often relations (e.g. Portico of Octavia, of Marcellus). Even his of Augustus was built before his death to house members of his family.(Eck (2003), 118121) To celebrate his victory at the Battle of Actium, the Arch of Augustus was built in 29 BC near the entrance of the of Castor and Pollux, and widened in 19 BC to include a triple-arch design.( There are also many buildings outside of the city of Rome that bear Augustus name and legacy, such as the Theatre of Merida in modern Spain, the Carre built at Nmes in todays southern France, as well as the of Augustus at Turbie, located near Monaco.

Temple of Augustus and Livia in Vienne, late 1st century BC
After the death of Agrippa in 12 BC, a solution had to be found in maintaining Romes water supply system. This came about because it was overseen by Agrippa when he served as aedile, and was even funded by him afterwards when he was a private citizen paying at his own expense.(Eck (2003), 79.) In that year, Augustus arranged a system where the Senate designated three of its members as prime commissioners in charge of the water supply and to ensure that Romes aqueducts did not fall into disrepair.( In the late Augustan era, the commission of five senators called the curatores locorum publicorum iudicandorum (translated as Supervisors of Public Property) was put in charge of maintaining public buildings and temples of the state cult.(  Augustus created the senatorial group of the curatores viarum (translated as Supervisors for Roads) for the upkeep of roads; this senatorial commission worked with local officials and contractors to organize regular repairs.(Eck (2003), 81.)

The order of architectural style originating from ancient Greece was the dominant architectural style in the age of Augustus and the imperial phase of Rome.(Bunson (1994), 34.) Suetonius once commented that Rome was unworthy of its status as an imperial capital, yet Augustus and Agrippa set out to dismantle this sentiment by transforming the appearance of Rome upon the classical Greek model.(

Physical appearance
The biographer Suetonius describes Augustus outward appearance as follows: He was unusually handsome ... He had clear, bright eyes ... His teeth were wide apart, small, and ill-kept; his hair was slightly curly and inclining to golden; his eyebrows met. His ears were of moderate size, and his nose projected a little at the top and then bent ever so slightly inward. His complexion was between dark and fair. He was short of stature ...(Suetonius, Augustus 79, translated by J. C. Rolfe.)

Ancestry

Ancestors of Augustus 





Descendants
Augustus only child was his daughter.
:1. Julia Caesaris, 39 BC  AD 14, had five children;
::A. Gaius Julius Caesar, 20 BC  AD 4, died without issue
::B. Vipsania Julia (Julia the Younger), 19 BC  AD 28, had two children;
:::I. Lepida (fiancee of Claudius), 4 BC  AD 53, had five children;
::::a. Junius Silanus Torquatus, 14  54, had one child;
:::::i. Junius Silanus Torquatus the younger, 5066, died young
::::b. Calvina, 1579, died without issue
::::c. Junius Silanus Torquatus, d. 64 without issue
::::d. Junius Silanus Torquatus the elder, d. 49 without issue
::::e. Lepida, ca 1865, issue unknown
:::II. Unnamed illegitimate son (by Decimus Junius Silanus), d. AD 8 (ordered to be exposed by Augustus)
::C. Lucius Julius Caesar, 17 BC  AD 2, died without issue
::D. Vipsania Agrippina II (Agrippina the Elder), 14 BC  AD 33, had six children;
:::I. Nero Julius Caesar, 630, died without issue
:::II. Drusus Julius Caesar, 733, died without issue
:::III. Gaius Julius Caesar, bef. AD 12 - bef. AD 12 (CIL 06, 00889)
:::IV. Gaius Julius Caesar (Caligula), 1241, had one child;
::::a. Drusilla, 3941, died young
:::V. Julia Agrippina, 1559, had one child;
::::a. Nero Claudius Caesar (Lucius Domitius Ahenobarbus), 3768, had one child;
:::::i. Augusta, Jan. 63  April 63; died young
:::VI. Julia Drusilla, 1638, died without issue
:::VII. Livilla, 1842, died without issue
:::VIII. Tiberius Julius Caesar, ? - ? (either born before Caesar, between Caesar and Gaius Caesar (Caligula) or between Gaius Caesar (Caligula) and Agrippina)(CIL 06, 00888)
:::?IX. Son (name unknown), ? - ? (CIL 06, 00890)
::E. Postumus, 12 BC  AD 14, died without issue

 Bibliography 

* Ando, Clifford, Imperial ideology and provincial loyalty in the Roman Empire, University of California Press, 2000.
* Bivar, A.D.H. (1983). The Political History of Iran Under the Arsacids, in The Cambridge History of Iran (Vol 3:1), 2199. Edited by Ehsan Yarshater. London, New York, New Rochelle, Melbourne, and Sydney: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-20092-9.
* Blackburn, Bonnie & Holford-Strevens, Leofranc. (1999). The Oxford Companion to the Year. Oxford University Press. Reprinted with corrections 2003.
* Bourne, Ella. Augustus as a Letter-Writer, Transactions and Proceedings of the American Philological Association (Volume 49, 1918): 5366.
* 
* Brosius, Maria. (2006). The Persians: An Introduction. London & New York: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-32089-4 (hbk).
* Bunson, Matthew. (1994). of the Roman Empire. New York: Facts on File Inc. ISBN 978-0-8160-3182-5
* Chisholm, Kitty and John Ferguson. (1981). Rome: The Augustan Age; A Source Book. Oxford: Oxford University Press, in association with the Open University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-872108-6
* Dio, Cassius. (1987) The Roman History: The Reign of Augustus. Translated by Ian Scott-Kilvert. London: Penguin Books. ISBN 978-0-14-044448-3.
* Davies, Mark; Swain, Hilary; Davies, Mark Everson, Aspects of Roman history, 82 BC-AD 14: a source-based approach, Taylor & Francis e-Library, 2010.
* Eck, Werner; translated by Deborah Lucas Schneider; new material by Sarolta A. Takcs. (2003) The Age of Augustus. Oxford: Blackwell Publishing (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-631-22957-5; paperback, ISBN 978-0-631-22958-2).
* Eder, Walter. (2005). Augustus and the Power of Tradition, in The Cambridge Companion to the Age of Augustus (Cambridge Companions to the Ancient World), ed. Karl Galinsky, 1332. Cambridge, MA; New York: Cambridge University Press (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-521-80796-8; paperback, ISBN 978-0-521-00393-3).
* Everitt, Anthony (2006) Augustus: The Life of Romes First Emperor. Random House Books. ISBN 1-4000-6128-8.
* 
* Gruen, Erich S. (2005). Augustus and the Making of the Principate, in The Cambridge Companion to the Age of Augustus (Cambridge Companions to the Ancient World), ed. Karl Galinsky, 3351. Cambridge, MA; New York: Cambridge University Press (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-521-80796-8; paperback, ISBN 978-0-521-00393-3).
* Holland, Richard, Augustus, Godfather of Europe, Sutton Publishing, 2005.
* Kelsall, Malcolm. Augustus and Pope, The Huntington Library Quarterly (Volume 39, Number 2, 1976): 117131.
* 
* Raaflaub, Kurt A.; Toher, Mark, Between republic and empire: interpretations of Augustus and his principate, University of California Press, 1993.
* Scott, Kenneth. The Political Propaganda of 4430 B.C. Memoirs of the American Academy in Rome, Vol. 11, (1933), pp. 749.
* 
*
* Rowell, Henry Thompson. (1962). The Centers of Civilization Series: Volume 5; Rome in the Augustan Age. Norman: University of Oklahoma Press. ISBN 978-0-8061-0956-5
* Shaw-Smith, R. A Letter from Augustus to Tiberius, Greece & Rome (Volume 18, Number 2, 1971): 213214.
* Shotter, D.C.A. Tiberius and the Spirit of Augustus, Greece & Rome (Volume 13, Number 2, 1966): 207212.
* Southern, Pat. (1998). Augustus. London: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-16631-7.
* Starr, Chester G., Jr. The Perfect Democracy of the Roman Empire, The American Historical Review (Volume 58, Number 1, 1952): 116.
* 
* Wells, Colin Michael, The Roman Empire, Harvard University Press, 2004.


See also

* literature (ancient Rome)
* poetry
* Edict
* Comet
* Maecenas
* Octavian (Rome character)
* trade and relations
* family tree
* (gens)
* of Augustus


References
Footnotes


Citations


Further reading

* Bleicken, Jochen. (1998). Augustus. Eine Biographie. Berlin.
*
* Galinsky, Karl. Augustan Culture. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press, 1998 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-691-05890-0).
*
* Lewis, P. R. and G. D. B. Jones, Roman gold-mining in north-west Spain, Journal of Roman Studies 60 (1970): 16985
* Jones, R. F. J. and Bird, D. G., Roman gold-mining in north-west Spain, II: Workings on the Rio Duerna, Journal of Roman Studies 62 (1972): 5974.
* Jones, A.H.M. The Imperium of Augustus, The Journal of Roman Studies, Vol. 41, Parts 1 and 2. (1951), pp. 112119.
* Jones, A.H.M. Augustus. London: Chatto & Windus, 1970 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-7011-1626-2).
*
* Osgood, Josiah. Caesars Legacy: Civil War and the Emergence of the Roman Empire. New York: Cambridge University Press (USA), 2006 (hardback, ISBN 978-0-521-85582-2; paperback, ISBN 978-0-521-67177-4).
* Raaflaub, Kurt A. & Toher, Mark (eds.). Between Republic and Empire: Interpretations of Augustus and His Principate. Berkeley; Los Angeles: University of California Press, 1993 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-520-08447-6).
* Reinhold, Meyer. The Golden Age of Augustus (Aspects of Antiquity). Toronto, ON: Univ. of Toronto Press, 1978 (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-89522-007-3; paperback, ISBN 978-0-89522-008-0).
* Roebuck, C. (1966). The World of Ancient Times. New York: Charles Scribners Sons.
*
* Southern, Pat. Augustus (Roman Imperial Biographies). New York: Routledge, 1998 (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-415-16631-7); 2001 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-415-25855-5).
* Zanker, Paul. The Power of Images in the Age of Augustus (Thomas Spencer Jerome Lectures). Ann Arbor, MI: University of Michigan Press, 1989 (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-472-10101-6); 1990 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-472-08124-0).


External links

;Primary sources
* Cassius Dios Roman History: Books 4556, English translation
* Gallery of the Ancient Art: August
* Humor of Augustus
* Life of Augustus by of Damascus, English translation
* Suetonius biography of Augustus, Latin text with English translation
* The Res Gestae Divi Augusti (The Deeds of Augustus, his own account: complete Latin and Greek texts with facing English translation)
* The Via Iulia Augusta: road built by the Romans; constructed on the orders of Augustus between the 1312 B.C.

;Secondary source material
* Augustusshort biography at the BBC
* Brown, F. The Achievements of Augustus Caesar, Clio History Journal, 2009.
* Augustus Caesar and the Pax Romanaessay by Steven Kreis about Augustuss legacy
* De Imperatoribus Romanisarticle about Augustus at Garrett G. Fagans online encyclopedia of Roman Emperors
* Octavian / Augustuspages by Yong-Ling Ow






















PLACE OF DEATHNola

































Octavianus
als:Augustus
()
Augusto

as:
Augustu
Avqust

zh-min-nan:Augustus


Augustus
bar:Augustus
bo:
Augustus
(impalaer)

ca:August
ceb:Augusto
cs:Augustus
cy:Augustus
da:Augustus
de:Augustus
et:Augustus

Augusto
Cezaro
Augusto
fa:
hif:Augustus
fo:Augustus
fr:Auguste
Oktavianus
ga:gastas
Augusto
gan:
hak:O-k-s-t
ko:


hr:August
id:Octavianus
Augusto
is:gstus
it:Augusto

jv:Augustus
kn:

sw:Augusto
ku:Augustus
Iulius Caesar Octavianus Augustus
lv:Oktavins
lt:Augustas
(imperador roman)
Octavianus Caesar Augustus

ml:
mr:
()
ms:Augustus

my:
Caesar Augustus
ja:
nap:Augusto
no:Augustus
av Romarriket
oc:August
pnb:
nds:Augustus
August
pt:Augusto

Avgust
August
rm:Augustus


Kaisara

sq:Augustus
Augustu
simple:Augustus
Augustus
Avgust Oktavijan

(rimski car)
su:Octavianus
fi:Augustus
sv:Augustus
Augusto
ta:
th:
Divi Filius Augustus
Awgust

ur:
vi:Augustus
fiu-vro:Augustus
gusse
zh-classical:
war:Augustus
yi:
yo:Augustus
zh-yue:
bat-smg:Augosts
zh:</eecs485_article_body>

</eecs485_article>
<eecs485_article>
	<eecs485_article_id>1354</eecs485_article_id>
	<eecs485_article_title>Andes</eecs485_article_title>
	<eecs485_article_body>


The Andes is the worlds longest continental range. It is a continual range of highlands along the western coast of America. This range is about  long, about  to  wide (widest between 18 degrees South and 20 degrees South latitude), and of an average height of about .

Along its length, the Andes is split into several ranges, which are  separated by intermediate depressions. The Andes is the location of several high plateaux  some of which host major cities such as Quito, Bogot, Arequipa, Medelln, Sucre, and Paz.

The so-called Altiplano plateau is the worlds second-highest plateau following the plateau. The Andes extend from north to south through seven South American countries; Argentina, Bolivia, Chile, Colombia, Ecuador, Peru and Venezuela.

The Andes range is the worlds highest mountain range outside of the continent of Asia. The highest peak, Mt. Aconcagua, rises to an elevation of about  above level. The peak of Mt. Chimborazo in the Ecuadorean Andes is farther from the centre of the Earth than any other location on the Earths surface. This is because of the bulge that results from the Earths rotation. The worlds highest volcanoes are in the Andes, including del Salado on the Chile-Argentina frontier which rises to 6,893 m (22,615 ft), and over 50 other volcanoes that rise above 6,000 m.

Name
The etymology of the word Andes has been debated. The major consensus is that it derives from the Quechua word anti, which means high crest. Others believe that Andes comes from Suyu, one of the four regions of the Inca empire. It is more likely however that the word Antisuyo derives from the use of Anti to designate mountain chains. Derivation from the Spanish andn (in the sense of cultivation terrace) has also been proposed, yet considered very unlikely.

Geography
thumb|Aerial view of Aconcagua.
The Andes can be divided into three sections: 

I. The Southern Andes in Argentina and Chile;

II. The Central Andes, including the Chilean and Peruvian cordilleras and parts of Bolivia;

III. The Northern Andes in Venezuela, Colombia, and Ecuador that consists of two parallel ranges, the Cordillera Occidental and the Cordillera Oriental. In Colombia, north of its the border with Ecuador, the Andes split in three parallel ranges, the western, central, and eastern ranges. (The cordillera occidental, central, and oriental).

In the northern part of the Andes, the isolated Nevada de Santa Marta range is often considered to be part of the Andes. The eastern range of Colombia is the only one that extends to Venezuela.(Andes travel map) The term cordillera comes from the Spanish word meaning cuerda, meaning rope. The Andes range is about  wide throughout its length, except in the Bolivian flexure where it is about  wide. The islands of the Dutch Caribbean Aruba, Bonaire, and Curaao, which lie in the Sea off the coast of Venezuela, were thought to represent the submerged peaks of the extreme northern edge of the Andes range, but ongoing geological studies indicate that such a simplification does not do justice to the complex tectonic boundary between the South-American and Caribbean plates.(
)

Geology


The Andes are a Mesozoic  Tertiary orogenic belt of mountains along the Ring of Fire, a zone of activity that encompasses the Pacific rim of the Americas as well as the Asia-Pacific region. The Andes are the result of tectonics processes, caused by the subduction of crust beneath the American plate. The main cause of the rise of the Andes is the compression of western rim of the American Plate due to the subduction of the Plate and the Plate. To the east, the Andes range is bounded by several basins such as Orinoco, Basin, Madre de Dios and Chaco which separates the Andes from the ancient cratons in eastern South America. In the south the Andes shares a long boundary with the former Patagonia Terrane. To the west, the Andes end at the Ocean, although the trench can be considered its ultimate western limit. From a geographical approach the Andes are considered to have their western boundaries marked by the appearance of coastal lowlands and a less rugged topography.

Orogeny

The western rim of the American Plate has been the place of several pre-Andean orogenies since at least the  of the late Proterozoic and early Paleozoic when several terranes and microcontinents collided and amalgamated with the ancient cratons of eastern South America, by then the South American part of Gondwana.

The formation of the modern Andes began with the events of the Triassic when Pangea began to break up and several rifts developed. It continued through the Jurassic Period. It was during the Cretaceous Period that the Andes began to take its present form, by the uplifting, faulting and folding of sedimentary and rocks of the ancient cratons to the east. The rise of the Andes has not been constant and different regions have had different degrees of tectonic stress, uplift, and erosion.

Tectonic forces above the zone along the entire west coast of South America where the Plate and a part of the Plate are sliding beneath the American Plate continue to produce an ongoing orogenic event resulting in minor to major earthquakes and eruptions to this day. In the extreme south a major fault separates del Fuego from the small Plate. Across the  wide Passage lie the mountains of the Peninsula south of the Scotia Plate which appear to be a continuation of the Andes chain.

Volcanism

Image:Browncanyonquilotoa.jpg|thumb|valley near Quilotoa, Ecuador.
thumb|Astronaut photograph with the high plains of the Andes Mountains in the foreground, with a line of young volcanoes facing the much lower Atacama Desert.

The Andes range has many active volcanoes, which are distributed in four volcanic zones separated by areas of inactivity. The Andean volcanism is a result of subduction of the Plate and Plate underneath the American Plate. The belt is subdivided into four main volcanic zones that are separated from each other by volcanic gaps. The volcanoes of the belt are diverse in terms of activity style, products and morphology. While some differences can be explained by which volcanic zone a volcano belongs to, there are significant differences inside volcanic zones and even between neighboring volcanoes. Despite being a type location for calc-alkalic and subduction volcanism, the Andean Volcanic Belt has a large range of volcano-tectonic settings, such as rift systems and extrensional zones, transpressional faults, subduction of ridges and seamount chains apart from a large range on crustal thicknesses and magma ascent paths, and different amount of crustal assimilations.

Ore deposits and evaporites
The Andes mountains host large ore and salt deposits and some of its eastern and thrust belt acts as traps for commercially exploitable amounts of hydrocarbons. In the forelands of the desert some of the largest copper mineralizations occurs making Chile and Peru the 1st and 2nd largest exporters of copper in the world. Porphyry copper in the western slopes of the Andes has been generated by hydrothermal fluids (mostly water) during the cooling of plutons or volcanic systems.  The porphyry mineralization further benefited from the dry climate that let them largely out of the disturbing actions of water. The dry climate in the central western Andes have also led to the creation of extensive saltpeter deposits which were extensively mined until the invention of synthetic nitrates. Yet another result of the dry climate are the salars of Atacama and Uyuni, the first one being the largest source of lithium at present day and the second the worlds largest reserve of the element. Early Mesozoic and Neogene plutonism in Bolivias Cordillera Central created the Bolivian tin belt as well as the famous, now depleted, deposits of Rico de Potos.

Climate and hydrology

thumb|Central Andes
thumb|Astronaut photograph of the Central Andes

The climate in the Andes varies greatly depending on location, altitude, and proximity to the sea. Temperature, atmospheric pressure and humidity decrease in higher elevations. The southern section is rainy and cool, the central Andes are dry. The northern Andes are typically rainy and warm, with an average temperature of  in Colombia. The climate is known to change drastically in rather short distances. Rainforests exist just miles away from the snow covered peak Cotopaxi. The mountains have a large effect on the temperatures of nearby areas. The line depends on the location. It is at between 4,500 and 4,800 m (14,800&ndash;15,800 ft) in the tropical Ecuadorian, Colombian, Venezuelan, and northern Peruvian Andes, rising to 4,800&ndash;5,200 m (15,800&ndash;17,060 ft) in the drier mountains of southern Peru south to northern Chile south to about 30S, then descending to  on Aconcagua at 32S,  at 40S,  at 50S, and only  in del Fuego at 55S; from 50S, several of the larger glaciers descend to sea level.()

The Andes of Chile and Argentina can be divided in two climatic and glaciological zones; the Andes and the Andes. Since the Dry Andes extends from the latitudes of Desert to the area of River, precipitation is more sporadic and there are strong temperature oscillations. The line of equilibrium may shift drastically over short periods of time, leaving a whole glacier in the ablation area or in the accumulation area.

In the high Andes of central Chile and Province glaciers are larger and more common than glaciers; this is due to the high exposure to radiation.(Jan-Christoph Otto, Joachim Gtz, Markus Keuschnig, Ingo Hartmeyer, Dario Trombotto, and Lothar Schrott (2010). Geomorphological and geophysical investigation of a complex rock glacier system - Morenas Coloradas valley (Cordon del Plata, Mendoza, Argentina))

Flora
The Andean region cuts across several natural and floristc regions due to is large extension from Caribbean Venezuela to cold, windy and wet Horn passing trough hyperarid Desert. Rainforests used to encircle much of the northern Andes but are now greatly diminished, especially in the Choc and inter-Andean valleys of Colombia. As a direct opposite of the humid Andean slopes are the relatively dry Andean slopes in most of western Peru, Chile and Argentina. Along with several Valles, they are typically dominated by deciduous woodland, shrub and xeric vegetation, reaching the extreme in the slopes near the virtually lifeless Desert.

About 30,000 species of plants live in the Andes with roughly half being endemic to the region, surpassing the diversity of any other hotspot.( The small tree pubescens, a source of quinine which is used to treat malaria, is found widely in the Andes as far south as Bolivia. Other important crops that originated from the Andes are tobacco and potatoes. The high-altitude Polylepis forests and woodlands are found in the Andean areas of Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Bolivia and Chile. These trees, by locals referred to as Queua, Yagual and other names, can be found at altitudes of  above sea level. It remains unclear if the patchy distribution of these forests and woodlands is natural, or the result of clearing which began during the Incan period. Regardless, in modern times the clearance has accelerated, and the trees are now considered to be highly endangered, with some believing that as little as 10% of the original woodland remains.()

Fauna
Image:Tunki Tanpupata.jpg|thumb|A male Cock-of-the-rock, a species found in humid Andean forests.
Image:Ausangate-hillside-MT.jpg|thumb|Herds of alpacas on the mountain Ausangate hillside.

The Andes is rich in fauna: With almost 3,500 species, of which roughly 2/3 are endemic to the region, the Andes is the most important region in the world for amphibians.(Tropical Andes - biodiversityhotspots.org)
The diversity of animals in the Andes is high, with almost 600 species of mammals (13% endemic), more than 1,700 species of birds (about 1/3 endemic), more than 600 species of reptile (about 45% endemic), and almost 400 species of fish (about 1/3 endemic).(

The Vicua and Guanaco can be found living in the Altiplano, while the closely related domesticated Llama and Alpaca are widely kept by locals as animals and for their meat and wool. The nocturnal chinchillas, two threatened members of the rodent order, inhabit the Andes alpine regions. The Condor, the largest bird of its kind in the Hemisphere, occurs throughout much of the Andes but generally in very low densities. Other animals found in the relatively open habitats of the high Andes include the huemul, cougar, foxes in the genus Pseudalopex, and, for birds, certain species of tinamous (notably members of the genus Nothoprocta), Goose, Coot, flamingos (mainly associated with hypersaline lakes),  Rhea, Flicker, Sandpiper-plover, miners, sierra-finches and diuca-finches.

Titicaca hosts several endemics, among them the highly endangered Flightless Grebe and Water Frog. A few species of hummingbirds, notably some hillstars, can be seen at altitudes above , but far higher diversities can be found at lower altitudes, especially in the humid Andean forests (forests) growing on slopes in Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Bolivia and far northwestern Argentina. These forest-types, which includes the Yungas and parts of the Choc, are very rich in flora and fauna, although few large mammals exists, exceptions being the threatened Tapir, Bear and Woolly Monkey.

Birds of humid Andean forests include mountain-toucans, quetzals and the Cock-of-the-rock, while species flocks dominated by tanagers and Furnariids commonly are seen - in contrast to several vocal but typically cryptic species of wrens, tapaculos and antpittas.

A number of species such as the Cinclodes and Tit-spinetail  are associated with Polylepis, and consequently also threatened.

Human activity


thumb|Map showing cultural influence in the Andes.

The Andes mountains form a north-south axis of cultural influences. A long series of cultural development culminated in the expansion of the civilization and Empire in the central Andes during the 15th century. The Incas formed this civilization through imperialistic militarism as well as careful and meticulous governmental management.(DAltroy, Terence N. The Incas. Blackwell Publishing, 2003) The government sponsored the construction of aqueducts and roads in addition to preexisting installations. Some of these constructions are still in existence today.

Devastated by European diseases to which they had no immunity, and civil wars, in 1532 the Incas were defeated by an alliance composed of tens of thousands allies from nations they had subjugated (e.g. Huancas, Chachapoyas, Caaris) and a small army of 180 Spaniards led by Pizarro. One of the few Inca sites the Spanish never found in their conquest was Picchu, which lay hidden on a peak on the eastern edge of the Andes where they descend to the Amazon. The main surviving languages of the Andean peoples are those of the Quechua and language families. Parish and Barclay Pentland surveyed a large part of the Bolivian Andes from 1826 to 1827.

In modern times, the largest Andean cities are Colombia, with a population of about eight million, Paz, Bolivia, and Ecuador.

Transportation
Image:Carretera transandina.jpg|thumb|Troncal 7 (Highway) in the Venezuelan Andes.

Several major cities exist either in the Andes or in the foothills, among which are Bogot and Colombia; Ecuador; Venezuela; Paz, Bolivia; Chile, and Peru. These and most other cities and large towns are now connected with asphalt-paved roads, while smaller towns are often connected by dirt roads, which may require a four-wheel-drive vehicle.(

The rough terrain has historically put the costs of building highways and railroads that cross the Andes out of reach of most neighboring countries, even with modern engineering practices. For example, the main cross over the Andes between Argentina and Chile is still accomplished through the Internacional Los Libertadores, and only recently the ends of some highways that came rather close to one another from the east and the west have been connected(). Much of the transportation of passengers is done via airline.

For decades, Chile claimed ownership of land on the eastern side of the Andes. However, these claims were given up in about 1870 during the of the Pacific between Chile, and the allied Bolivia and Peru, in a diplomatic deal to keep Argentina out of the war. The Army and Navy defeated the combined forces of Bolivia and Peru, and Chile took over Bolivias only province on the Pacific Coast, and some land from Peru, also - that was returned to Peru later. Bolivia has been a landlocked country ever since then.

However, if Chile had kept some land to  the east, the difficulties in transportation between east and west would have been enormous. There has also been bad blood between Bolivia and Chile ever since 1870, and these two countries have not had diplomatic relations since about 1974.

Because of the tortuous terrain in places, villages and towns in which  vehicles are of little use are still present. Locally, the relatives of the camel, the llama and the alpaca continue to carry out important uses as pack animals, but this use has generally diminished in modern times.

Agriculture
thumb|Photograph of young Peruvian farmers sowing maize and beans.

The ancient peoples of the Andes such as the Incas have practised irrigation techniques for over 6,000 years. Because of the mountain slopes, terracing has been a common practice. Terracing, however, was only extensively employed after Incan imperial expansions to fuel their expanding realm. The potato holds a very important role as an internally consumed staple crop. Maize was also an important crop for these people. However, they were mainly used for the production of the culturally important chicha. Currently, tobacco, cotton and coffee are the main export crops. Coca, despite eradication programmes in some countries, remains an important crop for legal local use in a mildly stimulating tea, and, both controversially and illegally, for the production of cocaine.

Mining
The Andes rose to fame for its mineral wealth during the Spanish conquest of South America. Although Andean Amerindian peoples crafted ceremonial jewelry of gold and other metals the mineralizations of the Andes were first mined in large scale after the Spanish arrival. Potos in present-day Bolivia was one of the principal mines of the Spanish Empire in the New World. de la Plata and Argentina derive their names from the silver of Potos.

Currently, mining in the Andes of Chile and Peru place these countries as the 1st and 3rd major producers of copper in the world. The Bolivian Andes produce principally tin although historically silver mining had a huge impact on the economy of 17th century Europe.

There is a long history of mining in the Andes, from the Spanish silver mines in Potos in the 16th century to the vast current copper deposits of Chuquicamata and Escondida in Chile and Toquepala in Peru. Other metals including iron, gold and tin in addition to non-metallic resources are also important.

Peaks

This list contains some of the major peaks in the Andes mountain range. The highest peak is Aconcagua of Argentina (see below).

Argentina


* Aconcagua, 
* Bonete, 
* Galn, 
* Mercedario, 
* Pissis, 


Image:Cerro tronador desde lago mascardi 01b.jpg|Tronador, Argentina/Chile


Border between Argentina and Chile
* Cerro Bayo, 
* Chaltn,  or 3,405 m, Patagonia, also known as Cerro Fitz Roy
* Escorial, 
* del Azufre, 
* Azufre, 
* Incahuasi, 
* Lastarria, 
* Llullaillaco, 
* Maipo, 
* Marmolejo, 
* del Salado, 
* Olca, 
* Nevada de Lagunas Bravas, 
* Socompa, 
* Tres Cruces, 6,749 m (south summit) (III Region)
* Tronador, 
* Tupungato, 
* Nacimiento, 


Image:andes - punta arenas.jpg|del Paine, Chile
Image:Llullaillaco.jpg|Llullaillaco, Argentina/Chile
File:Camino de Alta.jpg|Camino de Alta Montaa, Argentina/Chile


Bolivia
* Ancohuma, 
* Cabaray, 
* Chacaltaya, 
* Potos, 
* Illampu, 
* Illimani, 
* de Larancagua, 
* de Pacuni, 
* Anallajsi, 
* Sajama, 
* Pata, 
* Sabaya, 


Image:Nevado Sajama.jpg|Sajama
Image:Huayna Potos La Paz - Bolivia.jpg|Potos


Border between Bolivia and Chile
* Acotango, 
* Minchincha, 
* Irruputuncu, 
* Licancabur, 
* Olca, 
* Parinacota, 
* Paruma, 
* Pomerape, 


Image:Laguna Verde Bolivia.jpg|Licancabur, Bolivia/Chile
Image:Parinacota.jpg|Parinacota


Chile

* San Valentin, 
* Cerro Paine Grande, c.
* Mac, c.
* Darwin, c.
* Hudson, c.
* Castillo Dynevor, c.
* Tarn, c.
* Polleras, 


Image:Stgo Abril.jpg|Santiago de Chile on the western slopes of a snowcapped Andes
Image:Cuernos del Paine from Lake Peho.jpg|View of Cuernos del Paine in del Paine National Park


Colombia
* Cristbal Coln, 
* del Huila, 
* del Ruiz, 
* del Tolima, 
* Pico Pan de Azucar, 
* Ritacuba Negra, 
* Nevado del Cumbal, 
* Negro de Mayasquer, 
* Blanco, 
* del Quindo, 
* Purace, 
* Santa Isabel, 
* Juana, 
* Galeras, 
* Azufral. 


Image:Ritacuba-blanco.jpg|Ritacuba blanco the highest peak of Cordillera Oriental, Colombia.
Image:Nevado del Ruiz by Edgar.png|del Ruiz, Colombia


Ecuador
* Antisana, 
* Cayambe, 
* Chimborazo, 
* Corazn, 
* Cotopaxi, 
* Altar, 
* Illiniza, 
* Pichincha, 
* Quilotoa, 
* Reventador, 
* Sangay, 
* Tungurahua, 
* Titicacha, 


Image:Volcn Chimborazo, El Taita Chimborazo.jpg|Chimborazo near Riobamba, Ecuador.
Image:Volcn Tungurahua.jpg|Tungurahua Ecuador.
Image:EL CAYAMBE DESDE EL AVION.JPG|Cayambe, Ecuador.
Image:Volcn El Altar - Riobamba Ecuador.jpg|Volcn Altar - Riobamba - Ecuador


Peru
* Alpamayo, 
* Artesonraju, 
* Carnicero, 
* Misti, 
* El Toro, 
* Huandoy, 
* Huascarn, 
* Jirishanca, 
* de Huaytapallana, 
* Pumasillo, 
* Rasac, 
* Rondoy, 
* Sarapo, 
* Norte, 
* Grande, 
* Yerupaja, 
* Chico, 


Image:Alpamayo.jpg|Alpamayo, Peru
Image:El misti.jpg|Misti, Peru
Image:Nevadohuandoy.jpg|Huandoy, Peru


Venezuela
* Bolvar, 
* Humboldt, 
* Bonpland, 
* La Concha, 
* Piedras Blancas, 


Image:Bolvar usgs.jpg|Bolvar, Venezuela
File:Pico Humboldt.jpg|Humboldt, Venezuela


See also
*Geology - a journal
*line
*(god)
*Cordillera Mountains in the Philippines
*Mountain Passes of the Andes

Notes


References
*John Biggar, The Andes: A Guide For Climbers, 3rd. edition, 2005, ISBN 0-9536087-2-7
* Tui de Roy, The Andes: As the Condor Flies. 2005, ISBN 1-55407-070-8
* Fjelds, J., & N. Krabbe (1990). The Birds of the High Andes. Zoological Museum, University of Copenhagen, Copenhagen. ISBN 87-88757-16-1
* Fjelds, J. & M. Kessler. 1996. Conserving the biological diversity of Polylepis woodlands of the highlands on Peru and Bolivia, a contribution to sustainable natural resource management in the Andes. NORDECO, Copenhagen.

External links

*Andes geology (University of Arizona)
*Climate and animal life of the Andes
*Regions and Microclimates in the Andes
*http://www.peaklist.org/WWlists/ultras/southamerica.html Complete list of mountains in South America with a prominence of at least 












af:Andes
ar:
an:Andes
ast:Andes
dalar

Soa-meh
be:
be-x-old:
bar:Andn
bs:Andi
br:Ando
bg:
ca:Andes
cs:Andy
cy:Andes
da:Andesbjergene
de:Anden
et:Andid
el:
de los Andes
eo:Andoj
eu:Andeak
()
hif:Andes
fo:Andesfjll
des Andes
fy:Andes
hAindis
na h-Andes
gl:Andes
gan:

 
hr:Ande
io:Andi
id:Andes
ia:Andes
os:
is:Andesfjll
it:Ande

jv:Andes

krc:
ka:

sw:Andes
la:Andes
lv:Andi
lb:Anden
lt:Andai
lij:Andes
lmo:Ande
hu:Andok
mk:
ml:
mr:
arz:
Gunung Andes
de ls Andes


nl:Andes
ne:
ja:
no:Andes
nn:Andes
oc:Andes
pnb:
pms:Ande
pl:Andy
dos Andes
Cordilieri
qu:Antikuna
rue:
ru:
sq:Andet
scn:Andi
simple:Andes
sk:Andy
sl:Andi
sr:
sh:Ande
fi:Andit
sv:Anderna
tl:Andes



th:

Dalar
tk:Andlar
uk:
 

vi:Andes
fiu-vro:Andiq
war:Andes
yi:
zh-yue:
bat-smg:And
zh:</eecs485_article_body>

</eecs485_article>
<eecs485_article>
	<eecs485_article_id>1372</eecs485_article_id>
	<eecs485_article_title>Amber</eecs485_article_title>
	<eecs485_article_body>

Wood resin, the source of amber




Amber is fossilized tree resin (not sap), which has been appreciated for its color and natural beauty since Neolithic times.( Amber is used as an ingredient in perfumes, as a healing agent in folk medicine, and as jewelry. There are five classes of amber, defined on the basis of their chemical constituents. Because it originates as a soft, sticky tree resin, amber sometimes contains animal and plant material as inclusions. Amber occurring in coal seams is also called resinite, and the term ambrite is applied to that found specifically within New Zealand coal seams. (Poinar GO, Poinar R. The quest for life in amber. Basic Books, 1995, ISBN 0201489287, p. 133)

History and etymology
The English word amber derives from the Arabic anbar, via Medieval Latin ambar and Old French ambre. The word originally referred to a precious oil derived from the whale (now called ambergris). The sense was extended to fossil resin circa 1400, and this became the main sense as the use of ambergris waned.() The two substances were confused because they both were found washed up on beaches. Ambergris is less dense than water and floats; whereas amber is less dense than stone, but too dense to float.(see: Abu Zaid al Hassan from Siraf & Sulaiman the Merchant (851), Silsilat-al-Tawarikh (travels in Asia).) The word ambar was brought to Europe by the Crusaders. In French ambre gris was then distinguished from ambre jaune: ambre gris (gray amber) was ambergris; ambre jaune (yellow amber) was the fossil resin we now call amber.

Amber is discussed by Theophrastus, possibly the first historical mention of the material, in the 4th century BC. The Greek name for amber was    (electron) and was connected to the Sun God, one of whose titles was Elector or the Awakener.() The modern terms electricity and electron derive from the Greek word for amber and come from William Gilberts research showing that amber could attract other substances.() The word electron was coined in 1891 by the Irish physicist George Stoney whilst analyzing elementary charges for the first time.()()

The presence of insects in amber was noticed by the Elder in his Historia, and led him to theorize correctly that, at some point, amber had to be in a liquid state to cover the bodies of insects. Hence he gave it the expressive name of succinum or gum-stone, a name that is still in use today to describe acid as well as succinite, a term given to a particular type of amber by Dwight Dana (see below under Baltic Amber).

Heating amber will soften it and eventually it will burn, which is why in languages the word for amber is a literal translation of burn-Stone (nl. barnsteen, de. Bernstein, the latter of which the Polish word bursztyn derives from). Heated above 200C, amber suffers decomposition, yielding an oil of amber, and leaving a black residue which is known as amber colophony, or amber pitch; when dissolved in oil of turpentine or in oil this forms amber varnish or amber lac. 

Amber from the Sea has been extensively traded since antiquity and in the main land, from where amber was traded 2000 years ago, the natives called it glaes (referring to its see-through similarity to glass). 

The Baltic Lithuanian term for amber is Gintaras and Latvian Dzintars. They and the Slavic jantar are thought to originate from Phoenician jainitar (sea-resin). However, while most Slavic languages, such as Russian and Czech, retain the old Slavic word, in the Polish language, despite still being correct, jantar is used very rarely (even considered archaic) and was replaced by the word bursztyn deriving from the German analogue.

Composition and formation
Amber is heterogeneous in composition, but consists of several resinous bodies more or less soluble in alcohol, ether and chloroform, associated with an insoluble bituminous substance. Amber is a macromolecule by free polymerization of several precursors in the labdane family, e.g. communic acid, cummunol, and biformene.(Manuel Villanueva-Garca, Antonio Martnez-Richa, and Juvencio Robles Assignment of vibrational spectra of labdatriene derivatives and ambers: A combined experimental and density functional theoretical study Arkivoc (EJ-1567C) pp. 449458) These labdanes are diterpenes (C20H32) and trienes, equipping the organic skeleton with three alkene groups for polymerization. As amber matures over the years, more polymerization takes place as well as isomerization reactions, crosslinking and cyclization.

The average composition of amber leads to the general formula C10H16O.

Formation
Molecular polymerization, resulting from high pressures and temperatures produced by overlying sediment, transforms the resin first into copal. Sustained heat and pressure drives off terpenes and results in the formation of amber.()

Botanical origin
Fossil resins from Europe fall into two categories, the famous Baltic ambers and another that resembles the Agathis group. Fossil resins from the Americas and Africa are closely related to the modern genus Hymenaea,()
while Baltic ambers are thought to be fossil resins from Sciadopityaceae family plants that used to live in north Europe.()

Inclusions
The abnormal development of resin has been called succinosis. Impurities are quite often present, especially when the resin dropped on to the ground, so that the material may be useless except for varnish-making, whence the impure amber is called firniss. Enclosures of pyrites may give a bluish color to amber. The so-called black amber is only a kind of jet. Bony amber owes its cloudy opacity to minute bubbles in the interior of the resin.

In darkly clouded and even opaque amber, inclusions can be imaged using high-energy, high-contrast, high-resolution X-rays.()

Extraction and processing
 Distribution and mining 

Amber is globally distributed, mainly in rocks of Cretaceous age or younger.
Historically, the coast around Knigsberg in Prussia was the worlds leading source of amber. About 90% of the worlds extractable amber is still located in the Oblast of Russia on the Baltic Sea (which was previously Knigsberg in Prussia, before World War II).(Amber Trade and the Environment in the Kaliningrad Oblast)

Pieces of amber torn from the seafloor are cast up by the waves, and collected by hand, dredging, or diving. Elsewhere, amber is mined, both in open works and underground galleries. Then nodules of blue earth have to be removed and an opaque crust must be cleaned off, which can be done in revolving barrels containing sand and water. Erosion removes this crust from sea-worn amber.

Dominican amber, especially Dominican blue amber, is mined through pitting, which is dangerous due to the risk of tunnel collapse.(Wilfred Wichard und Wolfgang Weitschat: Im Bernsteinwald.  Gerstenberg Verlag, Hildesheim, 2004, ISBN 3-8067-2551-9)

Treatment

The Vienna amber factories, which use pale amber to manufacture pipes and other smoking tools, turn it on a lathe and polish it with whitening and water or with stone and oil. The final lustre is given by friction with flannel.

When gradually heated in an oil-bath, amber becomes soft and flexible. Two pieces of amber may be united by smearing the surfaces with oil, heating them, and then pressing them together while hot. Cloudy amber may be clarified in an oil-bath, as the oil fills the numerous pores to which the turbidity is due. Small fragments, formerly thrown away or used only for varnish, are now used on a large scale in the formation of amberoid or pressed amber. The pieces are carefully heated with exclusion of air and then compressed into a uniform mass by intense hydraulic pressure; the softened amber being forced through holes in a metal plate. The product is extensively used for the production of cheap jewelry and articles for smoking. This pressed amber yields brilliant interference colors in polarized light. Amber has often been imitated by other resins like copal and kauri, as well as by celluloid and even glass. Baltic amber is sometimes colored artificially, but also called true amber.

Appearance
Amber occurs in a range of different colors. As well as the usual yellow-orange-brown that is associated with the color amber, amber itself can range from a whitish color through a pale lemon yellow, to brown and almost black. Other more uncommon colors include red amber (sometimes known as cherry amber), green amber, and even amber, which is rare and highly sought after.

Much of the most highly-prized amber is transparent, in contrast to the very common cloudy amber and opaque amber. Opaque amber contains numerous minute bubbles. This kind of amber is known as bony amber.

Although all amber is fluorescent, the rarest Dominican amber is amber. It turns blue in natural sunlight and any other partially or wholly ultraviolet light source. In long-wave UV light it has a very strong reflection, almost white. Only about 100 kg is found per year, which makes it valuable and expensive.()

Sometimes amber retains the form of drops and stalactites, just as it exuded from the ducts and receptacles of the injured trees. It is thought that, in addition to exuding onto the surface of the tree, amber resin also originally flowed into hollow cavities or cracks within trees, thereby leading to the development of large lumps of amber of irregular form.

Classification
Amber can be classified into several forms. Most fundamentally, there are two types of plant resin with the potential for fossilization. Terpenoids, produced by conifers and angiosperms, consist of ring structures formed of isoprene (C5H8) units.( Phenolic resins are today only produced by angiosperms, and tend to serve functional uses. The extinct medullosans produced a third type of resin, which is often found as amber within their veins.( The composition of resins is highly variable; each species produces a unique blend of chemicals which can be identified by the use of pyrolysisgas chromatographymass spectrometry.( The overall chemical and structural composition is used to divide ambers into five classes.()( There is also a separate classifications of amber gemstones, according to the way of production.

Class I
This class is by far the most abundant. It comprises labdatriene carboxylic acids such as communic or ozic acids.( It is further split into three sub-classes. Classes Ia and Ib utilise regular labdanoid diterpenes (e.g. communic acid, communol, biformenes), whilst Ic uses enantio labdanoids (ozic acid, ozol, enantio biformenes).()

Ia
Includes Succinite ( normal Baltic amber) and Glessite.( Have a communic acid base. They also include much succinic acid.(

amber yields on dry distillation succinic acid, the proportion varying from about 3% to 8%, and being greatest in the pale opaque or bony varieties. The aromatic and irritating fumes emitted by burning amber are mainly due to this acid. Baltic amber is distinguished by its yield of succinic acid, hence the name succinite. Succinite has a hardness between 2 and 3, which is rather greater than that of many other fossil resins. Its specific gravity varies from 1.05 to 1.10. It can be distinguished from other ambers via spectroscopy due to a specific carbonyl absorption peak. IR spectroscopy can detect the relative age of an amber sample. Succinic acid may not be an original component of amber, but rather a degradation product of abietic acid.()

Ib
Like class Ia ambers, these are based on communic acid; however, they lack acid.(

Ic
This class is mainly based on enantio-labdatrienonic acids, such as ozic and zanzibaric acids.( Its most familiar representative is Dominican amber.(

Dominican amber differentiates itself from amber by being mostly transparent and often containing a higher number of fossil inclusions. This has enabled the detailed reconstruction of the ecosystem of a long-vanished tropical forest.(George Poinar, Jr. and Roberta Poinar, 1999. The Amber Forest: A Reconstruction of a Vanished World, (Princeton University Press) ISBN 0-691-02888-5) Resin from the extinct species protera is the source of Dominican amber and probably of most amber found in the tropics. It is not succinite but retinite.(Grimaldi, D. A.: Amber  Window to the Past.  American Museum of Natural History, New York 1996)

Class II
These ambers are formed from resins with a sesquiterpenoid base, such as cadinene.(

Class III
These ambers are polystyrenes.(

Class IV
This class is something of a wastebasket; its ambers are not polymerized, but mainly consist of cedrane-based sesquiterpenoids.(

Class V
Class V resins are considered to be produced by a pine or pine relative. They comprise a mixture of diterpinoid resins and n-alkyl compounds. Their type mineral is highgate copalite.()

Classification of Baltic amber (succinite) gemstones by the International Amber Association

*Natural Baltic amber  gemstone which has undergone mechanical treatment only (for instance: grinding, cutting, turning or polishing) without any change to its natural properties

*Modified Baltic amber  gemstone subjected only to thermal or high-pressure treatment, which changed its physical properties, including the degree of transparency and color, or shaped under similar conditions out of one nugget, previously cut to the required size.

*Reconstructed (pressed) Baltic amber  gemstone made of Baltic amber pieces pressed in high temperature and under high pressure without additional components.

*Bonded Baltic amber  gemstone consisting of two or more parts of natural, modified or reconstructed Baltic amber bonded together with the use of the smallest possible amount of a colorless binding agent necessary to join the pieces.

Geological record
The oldest amber recovered dates to the Upper Carboniferous period ().()() Its chemical composition makes it difficult to match the amber to its producers  it is most similar to the resins produced by plants.(There are no flowering plant fossils until the Cretaceous, and they were not common until the Cretaceous.) Amber becomes abundant long afterwards, in the Cretaceous, ,( when it is found in association with insects. The oldest amber with arthropod inclusions comes from the Middle East from Lebanon and Jordan (Kaddumi, 2007; Azar, 2000). This amber is roughly 133 million years old and is considered of high scientific value. Many remarkable insects and spiders were recently discovered in the amber of Jordan (Kaddumi, 2007) including the oldest zorapterans, clerid beetles, umenocoleid roaches, and achiliid planthoppers.

Baltic amber or succinite (historically documented as Prussian amber) is found as irregular nodules in marine glauconitic sand, known as blue earth, occurring in the Lower Oligocene strata of Samland in Prussia (Latin: Sambia), in historical sources also referred to as Glaesaria. After 1945 this territory around Knigsberg was turned into Oblast, Russia, where it is now systematically mined.() It appears, however, to have been partly derived from yet earlier Tertiary deposits (Eocene); and it occurs also as a derivative phase in later formations, such as drift. Relics of an abundant flora occur as inclusions trapped within the amber while the resin was yet fresh, suggesting relations with the flora of Eastern Asia and the southern part of America. Gppert named the common amber-yielding pine of the Baltic forests Pinites succiniter, but as the wood does not seem to differ from that of the existing genus it has been also called Pinus succinifera. It is improbable, however, that the production of amber was limited to a single species; and indeed a large number of conifers belonging to different genera are represented in the amber-flora.

Paleontological significance
Amber is a unique preservational mode, preserving otherwise unfossilizable parts of organisms; as such it is helpful in the reconstruction of ecosystems and organisms.(BBC  Radio 4  Amber. Db.bbc.co.uk. Retrieved on 2011-04-23.)

The chemical composition of the resin is, unfortunately, of limited utility in reconstructing the phylogenetic affinity of the resin producer.(

Amber sometimes contains animals or plant matter that became caught in the resin as it was secreted. Insects, spiders and their webs, annelids, frogs,() crustaceans, bacteria and amoebae,() marine microfossils,() wood, flowers and fruit, hair, feathers and other small organisms have been recovered in ambers dating to .(

Use
Amber has been used since antiquity in the manufacture of jewelry and ornaments, and also in medicine. Amber also forms the flavoring for akvavit liquor. Amber has been used as an ingredient in perfumes.

Jewelry
Amber has been used since the stone age, from 13,000 years ago.( Amber ornaments have been found in Mycenaean tombs and elsewhere across Europe. To this day it is used in the manufacture of smoking and glassblowing mouthpieces.()() Ambers place in culture and tradition lends it a tourism value; Amber Museum is dedicated to the mineral.

Historic medicinal uses
Amber has long been used in medicine for its purported healing properties. Amber and extracts were used from the time of Hippocrates in ancient Greece for a wide variety of treatments through the Ages and up until the early twentieth century.

Scent of amber and amber perfumery
In ancient China it was customary to burn amber during large festivities. If amber is heated under the right conditions, of amber is produced, and in past times this was combined carefully with acid to create artificial musk  a resin with a peculiar musky odor.(Amber as an aphrodisiac) Although when burned, amber does give off a characteristic pinewood fragrance, modern products, such as perfume, do not normally use actual amber. This is due to the fact that fossilized amber produces very little scent. In perfumery, scents referred to as amber are often created and patented(Saturated indane derivatives and processes for producing same, Ernst T. Thermer, p. 1 , , issue date 1972)(Perfume compositions and perfume articles containing one isomer of an octahydrotetramethyl acetonaphthone, John B. Hall, Rumson; James Milton Sanders, Eatontown , Publication Date: 30 December 1975)
to emulate the opulent golden warmth of the fossil.(Sorcery of Scent: Amber: A perfume myth. Sorceryofscent.blogspot.com (2008-07-30). Retrieved on 2011-04-23.) The modern name for amber is thought to come from the Arabic word, ambar, meaning ambergris.( Ambergris is the waxy aromatic substance created in the intestines of sperm whales and was used in making perfumes both in ancient times as well as modern. The scent of amber was originally derived from emulating the scent of ambergris and/or labdanum but due to the endangered status of the sperm whale the scent of amber is now largely derived from labdanum.() The term amber is loosely used to describe a scent that is warm, musky, rich and honey-like, and also somewhat oriental and earthy. It can be synthetically created or derived from natural resins. When derived from natural resins it is most often created out of labdanum. Benzoin is usually part of the recipe. Vanilla and cloves are sometimes used to enhance the aroma.

Amber perfumes may be created using combinations of labdanum, resin, copal (itself a type of tree resin used in incense manufacture), vanilla, resin and/or synthetic materials.(

See also
* of types of amber
* Ammolite
* Copal
* of amber
* Road
* Room
* Pearl
* coral

References



;Attribution
*


External links

*Farlang many full text historical references on Amber Theophrastus, Frederick Kunz, and special on amber.
* IPS Publications on amber inclusions International Paleoentomological Society: Scientific Articles on amber and its inclusions
* Webmineral on Amber Physical properties and mineralogical information
* Mindat Amber Image and locality information on amber
* NY Times 40 million year old extinct bee in Dominican amber











af:Barnsteen
ar:
an:Ambre
ast:mbar
az:Khrba
be:
bs:ilibar
bg:
ca:Ambre
cs:Jantar
cy:Ambr
da:Rav
de:Bernstein
et:Merevaik
el:
es:mbar
eo:Sukceno
eu:Anbar
fa:
fr:Ambre
gl:mbar
()
hr:Jantar
io:Sucino
id:Ambar
is:Raf
(resina)
he:
csb:Jantr
kk:
ku:Karban
la:Sucinum
lv:Dzintars
lt:Gintaras
li:Barnsjt
(raza)
(svny)
my:
nah:pozonalli
nl:Barnsteen
ja:
no:Rav
nn:Rav
nds:Barnsteen
pl:Bursztyn
pt:mbar
ro:Chihlimbar
ru:
simple:Amber
sk:Jantr
sl:Jantar
sr:
sh:Jantar
fi:Meripihka
sv:Brnsten
tl:Amber
ta:
th:
tr:Kehribar
uk:
phch
yi:
zh:</eecs485_article_body>

</eecs485_article>
